Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 COUNTY PROPERTY TAXES AND BUDGETS 2 Section 1. Section 331.423, subsection 1, paragraph b, 3 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 5 2024, but before July 1, 2028 2027 , subject to subparagraph 6 (3), the greater of three dollars and fifty cents per thousand 7 dollars of assessed value used to calculate taxes for general 8 county services for the budget year and the adjusted general 9 county basic levy rate, as adjusted under subparagraph (2), if 10 applicable. 11 Sec. 2. Section 331.423, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 12 2026, is amended to read as follows: 13 c. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2028, 14 three dollars and fifty cents per thousand dollars of assessed 15 value. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, the greater 16 of: 17 (1) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 18 equal to one thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred 19 two percent of the current fiscal yearâs actual property tax 20 dollars certified for levy under this subsection 1 divided by 21 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 22 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 23 valuation. 24 (2) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 25 that results in an amount of actual property tax dollars 26 certified for levy under this subsection 1 equal to one 27 hundred and one-half percent of the actual property tax dollars 28 certified for levy under this subsection 1 for the current 29 fiscal year. 30 Sec. 3. Section 331.423, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 31 by adding the following new paragraph: 32 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) For each fiscal year beginning 33 on or after July 1, 2028, the levy rate imposed under this 34 subsection 1 for the current fiscal year, unless subject to 35 -1- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 1/ 103 S.F. _____ subparagraph (2), and for the budget year beginning July 1, 1 2028, only, not less than a levy rate per one thousand dollars 2 of assessed value that results in an amount of actual property 3 tax dollars certified for levy under this subsection 1 equal 4 to one hundred and one-half percent of the actual property tax 5 dollars certified for levy under this subsection 1 for the 6 current fiscal year. 7 (2) (a) If the total assessed value, excluding value 8 attributable to new valuation, used to calculate taxes for 9 general county services under this subsection 1 for the budget 10 year is equal to or exceeds one hundred two percent of the 11 total assessed value used to calculate taxes for general 12 county services for the current fiscal year, the levy rate 13 imposed under this subsection 1 shall not exceed a levy rate 14 per one thousand dollars of assessed value that is equal to 15 one thousand multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing 16 the product of the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the 17 current fiscal yearâs actual property tax dollars certified 18 for levy under this subsection 1 by the remainder of the total 19 assessed value used to calculate such taxes for the budget year 20 minus value attributable to new valuation. 21 (b) (i) For purposes of this subparagraph, âbudget 22 adjustment factorâ is equal to one of the following, unless 23 modified by the general assembly on or before January 31 24 immediately preceding the applicable fiscal year: 25 (A) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 26 all urban consumers is less than four, one hundred two percent. 27 (B) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 28 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than four but less 29 than six, one hundred three percent. 30 (C) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 31 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than six but less 32 than eight, one hundred four percent. 33 (D) If the percentage change in the consumer price index 34 for all urban consumers is equal to or greater than eight, one 35 -2- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 2/ 103 S.F. _____ hundred five percent. 1 (ii) The percentage change in the consumer price index for 2 all urban consumers shall be equal to one hundred multiplied 3 by the quotient of the remainder of the published value of the 4 consumer price index for all urban consumers for the month 5 ending eight months prior to the beginning of the applicable 6 budget year minus the published value of the consumer price 7 index for all urban consumers for the month ending twenty 8 months prior to the beginning of the applicable budget year 9 divided by the published value of the consumer price index for 10 all urban consumers for the month ending twenty months prior to 11 the beginning of the applicable budget year. 12 Sec. 4. Section 331.423, subsection 2, paragraph b, 13 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 (1) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2024, 15 but before July 1, 2028 2027 , subject to subparagraph (3), the 16 greater of three dollars and ninety-five cents per thousand 17 dollars of assessed value used to calculate taxes for rural 18 county services for the budget year and the adjusted rural 19 county basic levy rate, as adjusted under subparagraph (2), if 20 applicable. 21 Sec. 5. Section 331.423, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 22 2026, is amended to read as follows: 23 c. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2028, 24 three dollars and ninety-five cents per thousand dollars of 25 assessed value. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, 26 the greater of: 27 (1) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 28 equal to one thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred 29 two percent of the current fiscal yearâs actual property tax 30 dollars certified for levy under this subsection 2 divided by 31 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 32 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 33 valuation. 34 (2) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 35 -3- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 3/ 103 S.F. _____ that results in an amount of actual property tax dollars 1 certified for levy under this subsection 2 equal to one 2 hundred and one-half percent of the actual property tax dollars 3 certified for levy under this subsection 2 for the current 4 fiscal year. 5 Sec. 6. Section 331.423, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 6 by adding the following new paragraph: 7 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) For each fiscal year beginning 8 on or after July 1, 2028, the levy rate imposed under this 9 subsection 2 for the current fiscal year, unless subject to 10 subparagraph (2), and for the budget year beginning July 1, 11 2028, only, not less than a levy rate per one thousand dollars 12 of assessed value that results in an amount of actual property 13 tax dollars certified for levy under this subsection 2 equal 14 to one hundred and one-half percent of the actual property tax 15 dollars certified for levy under this subsection 2 for the 16 current fiscal year. 17 (2) (a) If the total assessed value, excluding value 18 attributable to new valuation, used to calculate taxes for 19 rural county services under this subsection 2 for the budget 20 year is equal to or exceeds one hundred two percent of the 21 total assessed value used to calculate taxes for rural county 22 services for the current fiscal year, the levy rate imposed 23 under this subsection 2 shall not exceed a levy rate per 24 one thousand dollars of assessed value that is equal to one 25 thousand multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the 26 product of the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the 27 current fiscal yearâs actual property tax dollars certified 28 for levy under this subsection 2 by the remainder of the total 29 assessed value used to calculate such taxes for the budget year 30 minus value attributable to new valuation. 31 (b) (i) For purposes of this subparagraph, âbudget 32 adjustment factorâ is equal to one of the following, unless 33 modified by the general assembly on or before January 31 34 immediately preceding the applicable fiscal year: 35 -4- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 4/ 103 S.F. _____ (A) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 1 all urban consumers is less than four, one hundred two percent. 2 (B) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 3 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than four but less 4 than six, one hundred three percent. 5 (C) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 6 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than six but less 7 than eight, one hundred four percent. 8 (D) If the percentage change in the consumer price index 9 for all urban consumers is equal to or greater than eight, one 10 hundred five percent. 11 (ii) The percentage change in the consumer price index for 12 all urban consumers shall be equal to one hundred multiplied 13 by the quotient of the remainder of the published value of the 14 consumer price index for all urban consumers for the month 15 ending eight months prior to the beginning of the applicable 16 budget year minus the published value of the consumer price 17 index for all urban consumers for the month ending twenty 18 months prior to the beginning of the applicable budget year 19 divided by the published value of the consumer price index for 20 all urban consumers for the month ending twenty months prior to 21 the beginning of the applicable budget year. 22 Sec. 7. Section 331.423, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 23 by adding the following new paragraph: 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. âNew valuationâ means the increase 25 from the current fiscal year to the budget year in taxable 26 valuation, as shown on the assessment roll due to the 27 following, the amount of each as reported under section 331.510 28 by the county auditor to the department of management: 29 (1) New construction. 30 (2) Additions or improvements to existing structures that 31 are not normal and necessary repairs under section 441.21, 32 subsection 8. 33 (3) Net boundary adjustments, including annexation, 34 severance, incorporation, consolidation, or discontinuance as 35 -5- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 5/ 103 S.F. _____ those terms are defined in section 368.1. 1 Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 2 effect January 1, 2027. 3 Sec. 9. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 4 to property taxes and budgets for fiscal years beginning on or 5 after July 1, 2027. 6 DIVISION II 7 CITY PROPERTY TAXES AND BUDGETS 8 Sec. 10. Section 384.1, subsection 3, paragraph c, 9 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 (1) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 11 2024, but before July 1, 2028 2027 , subject to subparagraph 12 (3), a cityâs tax levy for the general fund, except for levies 13 authorized in section 384.12 , shall not exceed in any tax year 14 the greater of eight dollars and ten cents per thousand dollars 15 of assessed value used to calculate taxes for the budget year 16 and the adjusted city general fund levy rate, as adjusted under 17 subparagraph (2), if applicable. 18 Sec. 11. Section 384.1, subsection 3, paragraph d, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 d. (1) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 21 2028, a cityâs tax levy rate for the general fund, except for 22 levies authorized in section 384.12 , shall not exceed eight 23 dollars and ten cents per thousand dollars of assessed value 24 used to calculate taxes in any fiscal year. For the fiscal 25 year beginning July 1, 2027, a cityâs tax levy rate for the 26 general fund, except for levies authorized in section 384.12, 27 shall not exceed the greater of: 28 (a) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 29 equal to one thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred 30 two percent of the current fiscal yearâs actual property tax 31 dollars certified for levy under this subsection divided by 32 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 33 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 34 valuation. 35 -6- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 6/ 103 S.F. _____ (b) A levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 1 that results in an amount of actual property tax dollars 2 certified for levy under this subsection equal to one hundred 3 and one-half percent of the actual property tax dollars 4 certified for levy under this subsection for the current fiscal 5 year. 6 (2) Notwithstanding other provisions of this paragraph, 7 if a cityâs actual levy rate for the current fiscal year is 8 zero dollars per one thousand dollars of assessed value, a levy 9 rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value equal to one 10 thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred two percent 11 of the cityâs certified general fund budget for the current 12 fiscal year divided by the remainder of the total assessed 13 value used to calculate taxes for the budget year minus value 14 attributable to new valuation. 15 Sec. 12. Section 384.1, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 16 by adding the following new paragraph: 17 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. (1) For each fiscal year beginning on 18 or after July 1, 2028, a cityâs tax levy rate for the general 19 fund, except for levies authorized in section 384.12, shall 20 not exceed the levy rate imposed under this subsection for the 21 current fiscal year, unless subject to subparagraph (2), and 22 for the budget year beginning July 1, 2028, only, not less than 23 a levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value that 24 results in an amount of actual property tax dollars certified 25 for levy under this subsection equal to one hundred and 26 one-half percent of the actual property tax dollars certified 27 for levy under this subsection for the current fiscal year. 28 (2) (a) If the total assessed value, excluding value 29 attributable to new valuation, used to calculate taxes under 30 this subsection for the budget year is equal to or exceeds 31 one hundred two percent of the total assessed value used to 32 calculate taxes under this subsection for the current fiscal 33 year, the cityâs levy rate under this subsection shall not 34 exceed a levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value 35 -7- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 7/ 103 S.F. _____ that is equal to one thousand multiplied by the quotient 1 obtained by dividing the product of the budget adjustment 2 factor multiplied by the current fiscal yearâs actual property 3 tax dollars certified for levy under this subsection by the 4 remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate such 5 taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 6 valuation. 7 (b) (i) For purposes of this subparagraph, âbudget 8 adjustment factorâ is equal to one of the following, unless 9 modified by the general assembly on or before January 31 10 immediately preceding the applicable fiscal year: 11 (A) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 12 all urban consumers is less than four, one hundred two percent. 13 (B) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 14 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than four but less 15 than six, one hundred three percent. 16 (C) If the percentage change in the consumer price index for 17 all urban consumers is equal to or greater than six but less 18 than eight, one hundred four percent. 19 (D) If the percentage change in the consumer price index 20 for all urban consumers is equal to or greater than eight, one 21 hundred five percent. 22 (ii) The percentage change in the consumer price index for 23 all urban consumers shall be equal to one hundred multiplied 24 by the quotient of the remainder of the published value of the 25 consumer price index for all urban consumers for the month 26 ending eight months prior to the beginning of the applicable 27 budget year minus the published value of the consumer price 28 index for all urban consumers for the month ending twenty 29 months prior to the beginning of the applicable budget year 30 divided by the published value of the consumer price index for 31 all urban consumers for the month ending twenty months prior to 32 the beginning of the applicable budget year. 33 (3) Notwithstanding other provisions of this paragraph, 34 if a cityâs actual levy rate for the current fiscal year is 35 -8- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 8/ 103 S.F. _____ zero dollars per one thousand dollars of assessed value, the 1 cityâs levy rate under this subsection shall not exceed a levy 2 rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value equal to one 3 thousand multiplied by the quotient of one hundred two percent 4 of the cityâs certified general fund budget for the current 5 fiscal year divided by the remainder of the total assessed 6 value used to calculate taxes for the budget year minus value 7 attributable to new valuation. 8 Sec. 13. Section 384.1, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 9 by adding the following new paragraph: 10 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. âNew valuationâ means the increase 11 from the current fiscal year to the budget year in taxable 12 valuation, as shown on the assessment roll due to the 13 following, the amount of each as reported under section 331.510 14 by the county auditor to the department of management: 15 (1) New construction. 16 (2) Additions or improvements to existing structures that 17 are not normal and necessary repairs under section 441.21, 18 subsection 8. 19 (3) Net boundary adjustments, including annexation, 20 severance, incorporation, consolidation, or discontinuance as 21 those terms are defined in section 368.1. 22 Sec. 14. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 23 effect January 1, 2027. 24 Sec. 15. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 25 to property taxes and budgets for fiscal years beginning on or 26 after July 1, 2027. 27 DIVISION III 28 SCHOOL TAXES AND BUDGETS 29 Sec. 16. Section 257.1, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 b. (1) (a) For the budget year commencing July 1, 1999, 32 and for each succeeding budget year beginning before July 33 1, 2022, the regular program foundation base per pupil is 34 eighty-seven and five-tenths percent of the regular program 35 -9- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 9/ 103 S.F. _____ state cost per pupil. 1 (b) For the budget year commencing July 1, 2022, and for 2 each succeeding budget year beginning before July 1, 2027 , 3 the regular program foundation base per pupil is eighty-eight 4 and four-tenths percent of the regular program state cost per 5 pupil. 6 (c) For the budget year commencing July 1, 2027, and each 7 succeeding budget year, the regular program foundation base per 8 pupil is one hundred percent of the regular program state cost 9 per pupil. 10 (2) (a) For the budget year commencing July 1, 1991, and 11 for each succeeding budget year beginning before July 1, 2027, 12 the special education support services foundation base is 13 seventy-nine percent of the special education support services 14 state cost per pupil. 15 (b) For the budget year commencing July 1, 2027, and each 16 succeeding budget year, the special education support services 17 foundation base is one hundred percent of the special education 18 support services state cost per pupil. 19 (3) The combined foundation base is the sum of the regular 20 program foundation base, the special education support services 21 foundation base, the total teacher salary supplement district 22 cost, the total professional development supplement district 23 cost, the total early intervention supplement district cost, 24 the total teacher leadership supplement district cost, and the 25 total area education agency teacher salary supplement district 26 cost , and the amounts added to the combined district cost of 27 the school district for media services and educational services 28 under section 257.37 . 29 Sec. 17. Section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 a. (1) Except as provided in subsections 2 and 3 , a school 32 district shall cause to be levied each budget year beginning 33 before July 1, 2027 , for the school general fund, a foundation 34 property tax equal to five dollars and forty cents per thousand 35 -10- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 10/ 103 S.F. _____ dollars of assessed valuation on all taxable property in the 1 district. The county auditor shall spread the foundation levy 2 over all taxable property in the district. 3 (2) Except as provided in subsections 2 and 3, a school 4 district shall cause to be levied for the budget year beginning 5 July 1, 2027, and each succeeding budget year, for the school 6 general fund, a foundation property tax equal to four dollars 7 and forty-eight and six hundred sixty-two one-thousandths cents 8 per thousand dollars of assessed valuation on all taxable 9 property in the district. The county auditor shall spread the 10 foundation levy over all taxable property in the district. 11 Sec. 18. Section 257.3, subsection 2, paragraphs a and b, 12 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 13 a. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a reorganized school 14 district for which the reorganization takes effect on or after 15 July 1, 2027, shall cause a foundation property tax of four 16 three dollars and forty sixty-six cents per thousand dollars of 17 assessed valuation to be levied on all taxable property which, 18 in the year preceding a reorganization, was within a school 19 district affected by the reorganization as defined in section 20 275.1, or in the year preceding a dissolution was a part of a 21 school district that dissolved if the dissolution proposal has 22 been approved by the director of the department of education 23 pursuant to section 275.55. 24 b. In For a reorganized school district for which the 25 reorganization took effect on or after July 1, 2027, in 26 succeeding school years, the foundation property tax levy on 27 that portion shall be increased to the rate of four dollars and 28 ninety seven cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation 29 the first succeeding year, five four dollars and fifteen 30 twenty-eight cents per thousand dollars of assessed valuation 31 the second succeeding year, and five four dollars and forty 32 forty-eight and six hundred sixty-two one-thousandths cents per 33 thousand dollars of assessed valuation the third succeeding 34 year and each year thereafter under subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 35 -11- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 11/ 103 S.F. _____ Sec. 19. Section 257.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraphs: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (10) The amount added to the combined 3 district cost of the school district for media services under 4 section 257.37. 5 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (11) The amount added to the combined 6 district cost of the school district for educational services 7 under section 257.37. 8 Sec. 20. Section 257.4, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 9 2026, is amended to read as follows: 10 b. For the budget year beginning July 1, 2008, and 11 succeeding budget years beginning before July 1, 2027 , the 12 department of management shall annually determine an adjusted 13 additional property tax levy and a statewide maximum adjusted 14 additional property tax levy rate, not to exceed the statewide 15 average additional property tax levy rate, calculated by 16 dividing the total adjusted additional property tax levy 17 dollars statewide by the statewide total net taxable valuation. 18 For purposes of this paragraph, the adjusted additional 19 property tax levy shall be that portion of the additional 20 property tax levy corresponding to the state cost per pupil 21 multiplied by a school districtâs weighted enrollment, and then 22 multiplied by one hundred percent less the regular program 23 foundation base per pupil percentage pursuant to section 24 257.1 , and then reduced by the amount of the property tax 25 replacement payment to be received under section 257.16B and 26 the amount of the foundation base supplement payment to be 27 received under section 257.16D . The district shall receive 28 adjusted additional property tax levy aid in an amount equal 29 to the difference between the adjusted additional property 30 tax levy rate and the statewide maximum adjusted additional 31 property tax levy rate, as applied per thousand dollars of 32 assessed valuation on all taxable property in the district. 33 The statewide maximum adjusted additional property tax levy 34 rate shall be annually determined by the department taking 35 -12- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 12/ 103 S.F. _____ into account amounts allocated pursuant to section 257.15, 1 subsection 4 , and the balance of the property tax equity and 2 relief fund created in section 257.16A at the end of the 3 calendar year. 4 Sec. 21. Section 257.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. This subsection applies to budget years 7 beginning before July 1, 2027. 8 Sec. 22. Section 257.15, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, are 9 amended to read as follows: 10 2. Property tax adjustment aid for 1992-1993 and succeeding 11 years beginning before 2027-2028 . For the budget year beginning 12 July 1, 1992, and succeeding budget years beginning before July 13 1, 2027 , the department of education shall pay property tax 14 adjustment aid to a school district equal to the amount paid 15 to the district for the base year less an amount equal to the 16 product of the percent by which the taxable valuation in the 17 district increased, if the taxable valuation increased, from 18 January 1 of the year prior to the base year to January 1 of the 19 base year and the property tax adjustment aid. The department 20 of management shall adjust the rate of the additional property 21 tax accordingly and notify the department of education of 22 the amount of aid to be paid to each district from moneys 23 appropriated for property tax adjustment aid. 24 3. Property tax adjustment aid appropriation. There 25 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 26 department of education, for each fiscal year beginning 27 before July 1, 2027 , an amount necessary to pay property 28 tax adjustment aid to school districts under this section . 29 Property tax adjustment aid shall be paid to school districts 30 in the manner provided in section 257.16 . 31 Sec. 23. Section 257.15, subsection 4, paragraph a, 32 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (d), Code 2026, is 33 amended to read as follows: 34 (d) For the budget year beginning July 1, 2009, and 35 -13- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 13/ 103 S.F. _____ succeeding budget years beginning before July 1, 2027 , 1 twenty-four million dollars. 2 Sec. 24. Section 257.15, subsection 4, paragraph b, Code 3 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 b. After For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 2026, 5 after lowering all school district adjusted additional property 6 tax levy rates to the statewide maximum adjusted additional 7 property tax levy rate under paragraph âaâ , the department of 8 management shall use any remaining funds at the end of the 9 calendar year to further lower additional property taxes by 10 increasing for the budget year beginning the following July 11 1, the regular program foundation base per pupil percentage 12 under section 257.1 . Moneys used pursuant to this paragraph 13 shall supplant an equal amount of the appropriation made from 14 the general fund of the state pursuant to section 257.16 that 15 represents the increase in state foundation aid. Any moneys 16 remaining at the conclusion of the fiscal year beginning July 17 1, 2025, shall be transferred by the department of management 18 for deposit in the general fund of the state. 19 Sec. 25. Section 257.16A, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, 20 are amended to read as follows: 21 2. There For each fiscal year beginning before July 1, 22 2027, there is appropriated annually all moneys in the fund to 23 the department of management for purposes of section 257.15, 24 subsection 4 . 25 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any moneys remaining in 26 the property tax equity and relief fund at the end of a fiscal 27 year shall not revert to any other fund but shall remain in the 28 property tax equity and relief fund for use as provided in this 29 section for the following fiscal year. However, at the end of 30 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, any moneys remaining in 31 the property tax equity and relief fund shall be transferred 32 for deposit into either the secure an advanced vision for 33 education fund or the general fund of the state based on the 34 fund from which the moneys were received. 35 -14- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 14/ 103 S.F. _____ Sec. 26. Section 257.16B, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2023, 3 but before July 1, 2027, there is appropriated from the general 4 fund of the state to the department of education an amount 5 necessary to make all school district property tax replacement 6 payments under this section , as calculated in subsection 2 . 7 Sec. 27. Section 257.16D, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 8 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 a. There For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 2027, 10 there is appropriated annually from the fund to the department 11 of management an amount necessary to make all foundation base 12 supplement payments under this section . The department of 13 management shall calculate each school districtâs foundation 14 base supplement payment based on the distribution methodology 15 under paragraph âbâ . 16 Sec. 28. Section 257.16D, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 3. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any moneys remaining in 19 the foundation base supplement fund at the end of a fiscal year 20 shall not revert to any other fund but shall remain in the 21 foundation base supplement fund for use as provided in this 22 section for the following fiscal year. However, at the end of 23 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, any moneys remaining in 24 the foundation base supplement fund shall be transferred for 25 deposit in the secure an advanced vision for education fund. 26 Sec. 29. Section 257.31, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 27 following new subsection: 28 NEW SUBSECTION . 19. a. The board of directors of each 29 school district with an unexpended fund balance in the 30 districtâs management levy fund under section 298A.3 at the 31 conclusion of the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, that 32 exceeds an amount equal to the total expenditures from the 33 districtâs management levy fund for the fiscal year beginning 34 July 1, 2025, shall certify such unexpended fund balance and 35 -15- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 15/ 103 S.F. _____ expenditure amounts, including any reserved or designated 1 amounts in the fund and the purposes therefor, to the school 2 budget review committee by November 15, 2026. The committee 3 shall prescribe the form for such certifications. 4 b. The committee shall conduct a review of the unexpended 5 fund balances and expenditures of school district management 6 levy funds certified under paragraph âaâ . The committee 7 shall consult with boards of directors of school districts 8 and other relevant persons to determine the appropriateness 9 of establishing district management levy fund unexpended fund 10 balance limitations. By February 1, 2027, the committee 11 shall make recommendations to the general assembly for 12 establishing district management levy fund unexpended fund 13 balance limitations for fiscal years beginning on or after July 14 1, 2028, including recommendations for limitations based on a 15 percentage of the districtâs management levy fund expenditures 16 and recommendations for management levy limitations and 17 expenditure requirements for excess funds. 18 Sec. 30. Section 298.2, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 1. a. A physical plant and equipment levy of not exceeding 21 one dollar and sixty-seven eighteen cents per thousand dollars 22 of assessed valuation in the district is established except 23 as otherwise provided in this subsection . The physical plant 24 and equipment levy consists of the regular physical plant and 25 equipment levy of not exceeding thirty-three twenty-four cents 26 per thousand dollars of assessed valuation in the district 27 and a voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy of 28 not exceeding one dollar and thirty-four ninety-four cents 29 per thousand dollars of assessed valuation in the district. 30 However, the voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy 31 may consist of a combination of a physical plant and equipment 32 property tax levy and a physical plant and equipment income 33 surtax as provided in subsection 4 with the maximum amount 34 levied and imposed limited to an amount that could be raised 35 -16- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 16/ 103 S.F. _____ by a one dollar and thirty-four ninety-four cent property tax 1 levy. A voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy 2 approved prior to the effective date of this division of this 3 Act shall not exceed a rate that is seventy percent of the rate 4 approved at election. 5 b. For school budget years beginning on or after July 1, 6 2015 2027 , a school district may by resolution of the board of 7 directors adopted prior to April 30 preceding the budget year 8 impose a physical plant and equipment levy at a rate in excess 9 of the levy rate limitations under paragraph âaâ if the board 10 has refunded or refinanced a loan agreement entered into under 11 section 297.36 and such refunding or refinancing complies with 12 the maturity period authorized under section 297.36, subsection 13 1 , paragraph âcâ , and results in a lower amount of interest on 14 the amount of the loan agreement. However, the rate imposed 15 by a school district under this paragraph shall not exceed the 16 rate imposed during the budget year in which the loan agreement 17 was refunded or refinanced or seventy percent of such levy 18 rate if the refunding or refinancing occurred in the budget 19 year beginning July 1, 2026 . Authorization to exceed the levy 20 rate limitations of paragraph âaâ shall terminate upon the 21 maturity of the loan agreement after refunding or refinancing. 22 Upon adoption of the resolution under this paragraph âbâ , the 23 board shall comply with the requirements of section 297.36, 24 subsection 1 , paragraph âbâ . 25 Sec. 31. Section 298.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 26 by striking the subsection. 27 Sec. 32. Section 298.4, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 28 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 The Unless prohibited by subsection 1A, paragraph âaâ , the 30 board of directors of a school district may certify for levy by 31 April 30 of a school year, a tax on all taxable property in the 32 school district for a district management levy , subject to the 33 limitations in subsection 1A, paragraph âbâ . The revenue from 34 the tax levied in this section shall be placed in the district 35 -17- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 17/ 103 S.F. _____ management levy fund of the school district. The district 1 management levy shall be expended only for the following 2 purposes: 3 Sec. 33. Section 298.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 4 following new subsection: 5 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. a. (1) For the fiscal year beginning 6 July 1, 2028, if a school districtâs unexpended fund balance, 7 as defined in section 257.2, of the districtâs management levy 8 fund is equal to or exceeds one hundred eighty percent of the 9 average annual expenditures from the districtâs management 10 levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years immediately 11 preceding the base year, the board of directors shall not 12 certify a levy under this section for the fiscal year. 13 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2029, if a school 14 districtâs unexpended fund balance, as defined in section 15 257.2, of the districtâs management levy fund is equal to or 16 exceeds one hundred seventy-five percent of the average annual 17 expenditures from the districtâs management levy fund for the 18 three consecutive fiscal years immediately preceding the base 19 year, the board of directors shall not certify a levy under 20 this section for the fiscal year. 21 (3) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2030, if a school 22 districtâs unexpended fund balance, as defined in section 23 257.2, of the districtâs management levy fund is equal to or 24 exceeds one hundred seventy percent of the average annual 25 expenditures from the districtâs management levy fund for the 26 three consecutive fiscal years immediately preceding the base 27 year, the board of directors shall not certify a levy under 28 this section for the fiscal year. 29 (4) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2031, if a school 30 districtâs unexpended fund balance, as defined in section 31 257.2, of the districtâs management levy fund is equal to or 32 exceeds one hundred sixty-five percent of the average annual 33 expenditures from the districtâs management levy fund for the 34 three consecutive fiscal years immediately preceding the base 35 -18- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 18/ 103 S.F. _____ year, the board of directors shall not certify a levy under 1 this section for the fiscal year. 2 (5) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2032, and each 3 succeeding fiscal year, if a school districtâs unexpended 4 fund balance, as defined in section 257.2, of the districtâs 5 management levy fund is equal to or exceeds one hundred sixty 6 percent of the average annual expenditures from the districtâs 7 management levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years 8 immediately preceding the base year, the board of directors 9 shall not certify a levy under this section for the fiscal 10 year. 11 b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, if 12 a school district is not prohibited from certifying a levy 13 pursuant to paragraph âaâ , the maximum amount that the board of 14 directors may certify for levy under this section shall be an 15 amount equal to the remainder of one hundred eighty percent of 16 the average annual expenditures from the districtâs management 17 levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years immediately 18 preceding the base year minus the districtâs management levy 19 fund unexpended fund balance for the fiscal year preceding the 20 base year. 21 (2) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2029, if a school 22 district is not prohibited from certifying a levy pursuant to 23 paragraph âaâ , the maximum amount that the board of directors 24 may certify for levy under this section shall be an amount 25 equal to the remainder of one hundred seventy-five percent of 26 the average annual expenditures from the districtâs management 27 levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years immediately 28 preceding the base year minus the districtâs management levy 29 fund unexpended fund balance for the fiscal year preceding the 30 base year. 31 (3) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2030, if a school 32 district is not prohibited from certifying a levy pursuant to 33 paragraph âaâ , the maximum amount that the board of directors 34 may certify for levy under this section shall be an amount 35 -19- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 19/ 103 S.F. _____ equal to the remainder of one hundred seventy percent of the 1 average annual expenditures from the districtâs management 2 levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years immediately 3 preceding the base year minus the districtâs management levy 4 fund unexpended fund balance for the fiscal year preceding the 5 base year. 6 (4) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2031, if a school 7 district is not prohibited from certifying a levy pursuant to 8 paragraph âaâ , the maximum amount that the board of directors 9 may certify for levy under this section shall be an amount 10 equal to the remainder of one hundred sixty-five percent of 11 the average annual expenditures from the districtâs management 12 levy fund for the three consecutive fiscal years immediately 13 preceding the base year minus the districtâs management levy 14 fund unexpended fund balance for the fiscal year preceding the 15 base year. 16 (5) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2032, and each 17 succeeding fiscal year, if a school district is not prohibited 18 from certifying a levy pursuant to paragraph âaâ , the maximum 19 amount that the board of directors may certify for levy under 20 this section shall be an amount equal to the remainder of one 21 hundred sixty percent of the average annual expenditures from 22 the districtâs management levy fund for the three consecutive 23 fiscal years immediately preceding the base year minus the 24 districtâs management levy fund unexpended fund balance for the 25 fiscal year preceding the base year. 26 Sec. 34. Section 298.18, subsection 1, paragraph d, Code 27 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 d. (1) The amount estimated and certified to apply on 29 principal and interest for any one year may exceed two dollars 30 and seventy one dollar and eighty-nine cents per thousand 31 dollars of assessed value by the amount approved by the voters 32 of the school corporation, but not exceeding four two dollars 33 and five eighty-four cents per thousand dollars of the assessed 34 value of the taxable property within any school corporation, 35 -20- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 20/ 103 S.F. _____ provided that the registered voters of such school corporation 1 have first approved such increased amount at an election held 2 on a date specified in section 39.2, subsection 4 , paragraph 3 âcâ . Amounts approved at election before the effective date 4 of this division of this Act shall not exceed a rate that is 5 seventy percent of the rate approved at election. 6 (2) The levy rate limitations under this paragraph shall 7 not apply to the payment of general obligation bonds approved 8 for issuance at an election held on or before November 4, 2025, 9 that are sold on or after May 1, 2026, and the payment of such 10 bonds shall be subject to the levy rate limitations under 11 section 298.18, subsection 1, paragraph âdâ , Code 2026. 12 Sec. 35. Section 423F.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 13 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 (1) Prior to distribution of moneys in the secure an 15 advanced vision for education fund to school districts, an 16 amount equal to the equity transfer amount for the fiscal year 17 minus the foundation base transfer amount for the fiscal year 18 shall be distributed and credited to the property tax equity 19 and relief fund created in section 257.16A , an amount equal 20 to the foundation base transfer amount shall be distributed 21 and credited to the foundation base supplement fund created 22 in section 257.16D , general fund of the state to be used for 23 foundation aid resulting from the increase in the regular 24 program foundation base per pupil to one hundred percent of the 25 regular program state cost per pupil and an amount equal to 26 the career academy transfer amount for the fiscal year shall 27 be distributed and credited to the career academy fund created 28 in section 257.51 . 29 Sec. 36. Section 423F.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 30 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 31 subparagraph. 32 Sec. 37. Section 423F.3, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 33 2026, is amended to read as follows: 34 a. Reduction of the bond levies levy under sections section 35 -21- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 21/ 103 S.F. _____ 298.18 and 298.18A and all other debt levies. 1 Sec. 38. Section 425A.3, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 1. The family farm tax credit fund shall be apportioned 4 each year in the manner provided in this chapter so as to give 5 a credit against the tax on each eligible tract of agricultural 6 land within the several school districts of the state in which 7 the levy for the general school fund exceeds five dollars and 8 forty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value the levy 9 rate under section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . The 10 amount of the credit on each eligible tract of agricultural 11 land shall be the amount the tax levied for the general school 12 fund exceeds the amount of tax which would be levied on each 13 eligible tract of agricultural land were the levy for the 14 general school fund five dollars and forty cents per thousand 15 dollars of assessed value the levy rate under section 257.3, 16 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , for the previous year. However, 17 in the case of a deficiency in the family farm tax credit fund 18 to pay the credits in full, the credit on each eligible tract 19 of agricultural land in the state shall be proportionate and 20 applied as provided in this chapter . 21 Sec. 39. Section 425A.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 425A.5 Computation by county auditor. 24 The family farm tax credit allowed each year shall be 25 computed as follows: On or before April 1, the county auditor 26 shall list by school districts all tracts of agricultural 27 land which are entitled to credit, the taxable value for the 28 previous year, the budget from each school district for the 29 previous year, and the tax rate determined for the general 30 fund of the school district in the manner prescribed in 31 section 444.3 for the previous year, and if the tax rate is in 32 excess of five dollars and forty cents per thousand dollars of 33 assessed value the levy rate under section 257.3, subsection 34 1, paragraph âaâ , the auditor shall multiply the tax levy which 35 -22- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 22/ 103 S.F. _____ is in excess of five dollars and forty cents per thousand 1 dollars of assessed value the levy rate under section 257.3, 2 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , by the total taxable value of the 3 agricultural land entitled to credit in the school district, 4 and on or before April 1, certify the total amount of credit 5 and the total number of acres entitled to the credit to the 6 department of revenue. 7 Sec. 40. Section 426.3, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 426.3 Where credit given. 10 The agricultural land credit fund shall be apportioned each 11 year in the manner hereinafter provided so as to give a credit 12 against the tax on each tract of agricultural lands within the 13 several school districts of the state in which the levy for 14 the general school fund exceeds five dollars and forty cents 15 per thousand dollars of assessed value the levy rate under 16 section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ ; the amount of such 17 credit on each tract of such lands shall be the amount the tax 18 levied for the general school fund exceeds the amount of tax 19 which would be levied on said tract of such lands were the 20 levy for the general school fund five dollars and forty cents 21 per thousand dollars of assessed value the levy rate under 22 section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , for the previous 23 year, except in the case of a deficiency in the agricultural 24 land credit fund to pay said credits in full, in which case the 25 credit on each eligible tract of such lands in the state shall 26 be proportionate and shall be applied as hereinafter provided. 27 Sec. 41. Section 426.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 1. The agricultural land tax credit allowed each year 30 shall be computed as follows: On or before April 1, the 31 county auditor shall list by school districts all tracts of 32 agricultural lands which are entitled to credit, together with 33 the taxable value for the previous year, together with the 34 budget from each school district for the previous year, and the 35 -23- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 23/ 103 S.F. _____ tax rate determined for the general fund of the district in 1 the manner prescribed in section 444.3 for the previous year, 2 and if such tax rate is in excess of five dollars and forty 3 cents per thousand dollars of assessed value the levy rate 4 under section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , the auditor 5 shall multiply the tax levy which is in excess of five dollars 6 and forty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value the 7 levy rate under section 257.3, subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , by 8 the total taxable value of the agricultural lands entitled to 9 credit in the district, and on or before April 1, certify the 10 amount to the department of revenue. 11 Sec. 42. REPEAL. Section 298.18A, Code 2026, is repealed. 12 Sec. 43. ADJUSTMENT OF CALCULATIONS. For property tax 13 credits under chapters 425A and 426 for property taxes due and 14 payable in the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, the tax rate 15 determined for the general fund of the school district in the 16 manner prescribed in section 444.3 for the previous year shall 17 be determined using the appropriate property tax levy rate 18 under section 257.3, as amended in this division of this Act. 19 Sec. 44. EFFECTIVE DATE. Except for the section of this 20 division of this Act amending section 257.31, this division of 21 this Act takes effect January 1, 2027. 22 Sec. 45. APPLICABILITY. Except for the section of this 23 division of this Act amending section 257.31, this division 24 of this Act applies to fiscal years and school budget years 25 beginning on or after July 1, 2027. 26 DIVISION IV 27 PROPERTY CLASSIFICATIONS, VALUATIONS, AND ASSESSMENT 28 LIMITATIONS 29 Sec. 46. Section 386.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 386.8 Operation tax. 32 A city may establish a self-supported improvement district 33 operation fund, and may certify taxes not to exceed the 34 rate limitation as established in the ordinance creating the 35 -24- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 24/ 103 S.F. _____ district, or any amendment thereto, each year to be levied 1 for the fund against all of the property in the district, 2 for the purpose of paying the administrative expenses of 3 the district, which may include but are not limited to 4 administrative personnel salaries, a separate administrative 5 office, planning costs including consultation fees, engineering 6 fees, architectural fees, and legal fees and all other expenses 7 reasonably associated with the administration of the district 8 and the fulfilling of the purposes of the district. The taxes 9 levied for this fund may also be used for the purpose of paying 10 maintenance expenses of improvements or self-liquidating 11 improvements for a specified length of time with one or more 12 options to renew if such is clearly stated in the petition 13 which requests the council to authorize construction of the 14 improvement or self-liquidating improvement, whether or not 15 such petition is combined with the petition requesting creation 16 of a district. Parcels of property which are assessed as 17 residential property for property tax purposes are exempt from 18 the tax levied under this section except residential properties 19 within a duly designated historic district or property 20 classified as residential multiresidential property under 21 section 441.21, subsection 14 13 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph 22 (6) (5) . A tax levied under this section is not subject to the 23 levy limitation in section 384.1 . 24 Sec. 47. Section 386.9, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 386.9 Capital improvement tax. 27 A city may establish a capital improvement fund for a 28 district and may certify taxes, not to exceed the rate 29 established by the ordinance creating the district, or any 30 subsequent amendment thereto, each year to be levied for 31 the fund against all of the property in the district, for 32 the purpose of accumulating moneys for the financing or 33 payment of a part or all of the costs of any improvement or 34 self-liquidating improvement. However, parcels of property 35 -25- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 25/ 103 S.F. _____ which are assessed as residential property for property tax 1 purposes are exempt from the tax levied under this section 2 except residential properties within a duly designated historic 3 district or property classified as residential multiresidential 4 property under section 441.21, subsection 14 13 , paragraph âaâ , 5 subparagraph (6) (5) . A tax levied under this section is not 6 subject to the levy limitations in section 384.1 or 384.7 . 7 Sec. 48. Section 386.10, Code 2026, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 386.10 Debt service tax. 10 A city shall establish a self-supported municipal 11 improvement district debt service fund whenever any 12 self-supported municipal improvement district bonds are issued 13 and outstanding, other than revenue bonds, and shall certify 14 taxes to be levied against all of the property in the district 15 for the debt service fund in the amount necessary to pay 16 interest as it becomes due and the amount necessary to pay, 17 or to create a sinking fund to pay, the principal at maturity 18 of all self-supported municipal improvement district bonds as 19 authorized in section 386.11 , issued by the city. However, 20 parcels of property which are assessed as residential property 21 for property tax purposes at the time of the issuance of the 22 bonds are exempt from the tax levied under this section until 23 the parcels are no longer assessed as residential property 24 or until the residential properties are designated as a part 25 of a historic district or property classified as residential 26 multiresidential property under section 441.21, subsection 14 27 13 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (6) (5) . 28 Sec. 49. Section 404.2, subsection 2, paragraph f, Code 29 2026, is amended to read as follows: 30 f. A statement specifying whether the revitalization is 31 applicable to none, some, or all of the property assessed as 32 residential, multiresidential, agricultural, commercial, or 33 industrial property within the designated area or a combination 34 thereof and whether the revitalization is for rehabilitation 35 -26- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 26/ 103 S.F. _____ and additions to existing buildings or new construction or 1 both. If revitalization is made applicable only to some 2 property within an assessment classification, the definition of 3 that subset of eligible property must be by uniform criteria 4 which further some planning objective identified in the plan. 5 The city shall state how long it is estimated that the area 6 shall remain a designated revitalization area which time 7 shall be longer than one year from the date of designation 8 and shall state any plan by the city to issue revenue bonds 9 for revitalization projects within the area. For a county, 10 a revitalization area shall include only property which 11 will be used as industrial property, commercial property, 12 multiresidential property, or residential property. However, a 13 county shall not provide a tax exemption under this chapter to 14 commercial property , multiresidential property, or residential 15 property which is located within the limits of a city. 16 Sec. 50. Section 404.3, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 17 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 18 lieu thereof the following: 19 a. All qualified real estate assessed as any of the 20 following is eligible to receive a one hundred percent 21 exemption from taxation on the actual value added by the 22 improvements: 23 (1) Residential property. 24 (2) Commercial property if the commercial property 25 consists of three or more separate living quarters with at 26 least seventy-five percent of the space used for residential 27 purposes. 28 (3) Multiresidential property if the multiresidential 29 property consists of three or more separate living quarters 30 with at least seventy-five percent of the space used for 31 residential purposes. 32 Sec. 51. Section 404.3A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 33 follows: 34 404.3A Residential development area exemption. 35 -27- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 27/ 103 S.F. _____ Notwithstanding the schedules provided for in section 404.3 , 1 all qualified real estate assessed as residential property or 2 multiresidential property , excluding property classified as 3 residential multiresidential property under section 441.21, 4 subsection 14 13 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (6) (5) , in an 5 area designated under section 404.1, subsection 5 , is eligible 6 to receive an exemption from taxation on the first seventy-five 7 thousand dollars of actual value added by the improvements. 8 The exemption is for a period of five years. 9 Sec. 52. Section 404.3D, Code 2026, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 404.3D Exemptions for residential and multiresidential 12 property. 13 For revitalization areas established under this chapter 14 on or after July 1, 2024, and for first-year exemption 15 applications for property located in a revitalization area in 16 existence on July 1, 2024, filed on or after July 1, 2024, an 17 exemption authorized under this chapter for property that is 18 residential property or multiresidential property shall not 19 apply to property tax levies imposed by a school district. 20 Sec. 53. Section 441.21, subsection 1, paragraph b, 21 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 (1) The actual value of all property subject to assessment 23 and taxation shall be the fair and reasonable market value of 24 such property except as otherwise provided in this section . 25 âMarket valueâ is defined as the fair and reasonable exchange 26 in the year in which the property is listed and valued between 27 a willing buyer and a willing seller, neither being under any 28 compulsion to buy or sell and each being familiar with all 29 the facts relating to the particular property. Sale prices 30 of the property or comparable property in normal transactions 31 reflecting market value, and the probable availability 32 or unavailability of persons interested in purchasing the 33 property, shall be taken into consideration in arriving at 34 its market value. In arriving at market value, sale prices 35 -28- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 28/ 103 S.F. _____ of property in abnormal transactions not reflecting market 1 value shall not be taken into account, or shall be adjusted to 2 eliminate the effect of factors which distort market value, 3 including but not limited to built-to-suit construction, 4 sale-leaseback transactions, leased fee sales, sales to 5 immediate family of the seller between related parties , 6 foreclosure or other forced sales, contract sales, discounted 7 purchase transactions or purchase of adjoining land or other 8 land to be operated as a unit. 9 Sec. 54. Section 441.21, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 10 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 e. The actual value of agricultural property shall be 12 determined on the basis of productivity and net earning 13 capacity of the property determined on the basis of its use for 14 agricultural purposes capitalized at a rate of seven percent 15 and applied uniformly among counties and among classes of 16 property. However, for assessment years beginning on or after 17 January 1, 2027, structures on agricultural land constructed on 18 or after January 1, 2027, that are not agricultural dwellings 19 shall not be included in determination of productivity and 20 net earning capacity of agricultural property and shall not 21 be allocated any portion of the total county productivity 22 value so determined. However, such structures shall be 23 treated similarly to agricultural structures constructed 24 before January 1, 2027, when applying any equalization 25 order of the department. Such agricultural structures shall 26 instead be valued according to the structureâs replacement 27 cost less depreciation and obsolescence and the structureâs 28 assessed value subject to taxation prior to application of any 29 assessment limitation under subsection 4 shall be equal to the 30 product of the structureâs value multiplied by the agricultural 31 factor, as determined in 701 IAC 102.3(2) or succeeding rule of 32 the department. Any formula or method employed to determine 33 productivity and net earning capacity of property shall be 34 adopted in full by rule. 35 -29- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 29/ 103 S.F. _____ Sec. 55. Section 441.21, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 2. In the event market value of the property being assessed 3 cannot be readily established in the foregoing manner, then 4 the assessor may determine the value of the property using the 5 other uniform and recognized appraisal methods including its 6 productive and earning capacity, if any, industrial conditions, 7 its cost, physical and functional depreciation and obsolescence 8 and replacement cost, and all other factors which would assist 9 in determining the fair and reasonable market value of the 10 property but the actual value shall not be determined by use 11 of only one such factor. The following shall not be taken into 12 consideration: Special value or use value of the property to 13 its present owner, and the goodwill or value of a business 14 which uses the property as distinguished from the value of 15 the property as property. In addition, for assessment years 16 beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and unless otherwise 17 required for property valued by the department of revenue 18 pursuant to chapters 428 , 437 , and 438 , the assessor shall not 19 take into consideration and shall not request from any person 20 sales or receipts data, expense data, balance sheets, bank 21 account information, or other data related to the financial 22 condition of a business operating in whole or in part on the 23 property if the property is both classified as commercial or 24 industrial property and owned and used by the owner of the 25 business. However, in assessing property that is rented or 26 leased to low-income individuals and families as authorized by 27 section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and which 28 section limits the amount that the individual or family pays 29 for the rental or lease of units in the property, the assessor 30 shall, unless the owner elects to withdraw the property from 31 the assessment procedures for section 42 property, use the 32 productive and earning capacity from the actual rents received 33 as a method of appraisal and shall take into account the extent 34 to which that use and limitation reduces the market value of 35 -30- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 30/ 103 S.F. _____ the property. The assessor shall not consider any tax credit 1 equity or other subsidized financing as income provided to 2 the property in determining the assessed value. The property 3 owner shall notify the assessor when property is withdrawn 4 from section 42 eligibility under the Internal Revenue Code 5 or if the owner elects to withdraw the property from the 6 assessment procedures for section 42 property under this 7 subsection . The property shall not be subject to section 42 8 assessment procedures for the assessment year for which section 9 42 eligibility is withdrawn or an election is made. This 10 notification must be provided to the assessor no later than 11 March 1 of the assessment year or the owner will be subject to a 12 penalty of five hundred dollars for that assessment year. The 13 penalty shall be collected at the same time and in the same 14 manner as regular property taxes. An election to withdraw 15 from the assessment procedures for section 42 property is 16 irrevocable. Property that is withdrawn from the assessment 17 procedures for section 42 property shall be classified and 18 assessed as residential multiresidential property unless the 19 property otherwise fails to meet the requirements of subsection 20 14 13 . Upon adoption of uniform rules by the department of 21 revenue or succeeding authority covering assessments and 22 valuations of such properties, the valuation on such properties 23 shall be determined in accordance with such rules and in 24 accordance with forms and guidelines contained in the real 25 property appraisal manual prepared by the department as updated 26 from time to time for assessment purposes to assure uniformity, 27 but such rules, forms, and guidelines shall not be inconsistent 28 with or change the foregoing means of determining the actual, 29 market, taxable, and assessed values. 30 Sec. 56. Section 441.21, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2026, are 31 amended to read as follows: 32 4. For valuations established as of January 1, 1979 2026 , 33 the percentage of actual value at which agricultural and 34 residential property shall be assessed shall be the quotient of 35 -31- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 31/ 103 S.F. _____ the dividend and divisor as defined in this section determined 1 under this subsection . 2 a. (1) The percentage of actual value at which agricultural 3 property shall be assessed shall be the quotient of the 4 dividend and divisor as defined in this paragraph. The 5 dividend for each class of property shall be the dividend 6 as determined for each class of agricultural property 7 for valuations established as of January 1, 1978 2025 , as 8 determined under the applicable law for that assessment year, 9 adjusted by the product obtained by multiplying the percentage 10 determined for that year by the amount of any additions or 11 deletions to actual value, excluding those resulting from 12 the revaluation of existing properties, as reported by the 13 assessors on the abstracts of assessment for 1978 2025 , plus 14 six three percent of the amount so determined. 15 (2) However, if the difference between the dividend so 16 determined for either class of property and the dividend for 17 that class of property for valuations established as of January 18 1, 1978, adjusted by the product obtained by multiplying 19 the percentage determined for that year by the amount of 20 any additions or deletions to actual value, excluding those 21 resulting from the revaluation of existing properties, as 22 reported by the assessors on the abstracts of assessment for 23 1978, is less than six percent, the 1979 dividend for the other 24 class of property shall be the dividend as determined for that 25 class of property for valuations established as of January 26 1, 1978, adjusted by the product obtained by multiplying 27 the percentage determined for that year by the amount of 28 any additions or deletions to actual value, excluding those 29 resulting from the revaluation of existing properties, as 30 reported by the assessors on the abstracts of assessment for 31 1978, plus a percentage of the amount so determined which is 32 equal to the percentage by which the dividend as determined 33 for the other class of property for valuations established 34 as of January 1, 1978, adjusted by the product obtained by 35 -32- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 32/ 103 S.F. _____ multiplying the percentage determined for that year by the 1 amount of any additions or deletions to actual value, excluding 2 those resulting from the revaluation of existing properties, as 3 reported by the assessors on the abstracts of assessment for 4 1978, is increased in arriving at the 1979 dividend for the 5 other class of property. 6 (3) For valuations established for assessment years 7 beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the calculation of the 8 dividend for residential property under this subsection shall 9 exclude the value of all property described in subsection 14 , 10 paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6), 11 and the property described in subsection 14 , paragraph âaâ , 12 subparagraph (7), that contains three or more separate dwelling 13 units. 14 b. (1) The divisor for each class of property shall be 15 the total actual value of all such agricultural property in 16 the state in the preceding year, as reported by the assessors 17 on the abstracts of assessment submitted for 1978 2025 , as 18 determined under the applicable law for that assessment year, 19 plus the amount of value added to said total actual value 20 by the revaluation of existing properties in 1979 2026 as 21 equalized by the director of revenue pursuant to section 22 441.49 . The director shall utilize information reported on 23 abstracts of assessment submitted pursuant to section 441.45 24 in determining such percentage. For valuations established as 25 of January 1, 2027, and each assessment year thereafter, the 26 percentage of actual value as equalized by the department of 27 revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which agricultural 28 property shall be assessed shall be calculated in accordance 29 with the methods provided in this paragraph. 30 (2) For valuations established for assessment years 31 beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the calculation of the 32 divisor for residential property under this subsection shall 33 exclude the value of all property described in subsection 14 , 34 paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6), 35 -33- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 33/ 103 S.F. _____ and the property described in subsection 14 , paragraph âaâ , 1 subparagraph (7), that contains three or more separate dwelling 2 units. 3 c. (1) For valuations established as of January 1, 1980, 4 and each assessment year thereafter beginning before January 5 1, 2013, the percentage of actual value as equalized by the 6 director of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which 7 agricultural and residential property shall be assessed shall 8 be calculated in accordance with the methods provided in 9 this subsection , including the limitation of increases in 10 agricultural and residential assessed values to the percentage 11 increase of the other class of property if the other class 12 increases less than the allowable limit adjusted to include 13 the applicable and current values as equalized by the director 14 of revenue, except that any references to six percent in this 15 subsection shall be four percent. 16 (2) For valuations established as of January 1, 2013, and 17 each assessment year thereafter, the percentage of actual 18 value as equalized by the department of revenue as provided in 19 section 441.49 at which agricultural and residential property 20 shall be assessed shall be calculated in accordance with the 21 methods provided in this subsection , including the limitation 22 of increases in agricultural and residential assessed values to 23 the percentage increase of the other class of property if the 24 other class increases less than the allowable limit adjusted 25 to include the applicable and current values as equalized by 26 the department of revenue, except that any references to six 27 percent in this subsection shall be three percent. 28 b. (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 29 beginning January 1, 2025, the percentage of actual value as 30 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 31 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 32 be forty-four and five thousand three hundred forty-five 33 ten-thousandths percent. 34 (2) For valuations established for the assessment year 35 -34- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 34/ 103 S.F. _____ beginning January 1, 2026, and the assessment year beginning 1 January 1, 2027, the percentage of actual value as equalized 2 by the department of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at 3 which residential property shall be assessed shall be seventy 4 percent. 5 (3) For valuations established for the assessment year 6 beginning January 1, 2028, the percentage of actual value as 7 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 8 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall be 9 seventy-three percent. 10 (4) For valuations established for the assessment year 11 beginning January 1, 2029, the percentage of actual value as 12 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 13 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 14 be seventy-six percent. 15 (5) For valuations established for the assessment year 16 beginning January 1, 2030, the percentage of actual value as 17 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 18 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 19 be seventy-nine percent. 20 (6) For valuations established for the assessment year 21 beginning January 1, 2031, the percentage of actual value as 22 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 23 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 24 be eighty-two percent. 25 (7) For valuations established for the assessment year 26 beginning January 1, 2032, the percentage of actual value as 27 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 28 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 29 be eighty-five percent. 30 (8) For valuations established for the assessment year 31 beginning January 1, 2033, the percentage of actual value as 32 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 33 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 34 be eighty-eight percent. 35 -35- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 35/ 103 S.F. _____ (9) For valuations established for the assessment year 1 beginning January 1, 2034, the percentage of actual value as 2 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 3 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 4 be ninety-one percent. 5 (10) For valuations established for the assessment year 6 beginning January 1, 2035, the percentage of actual value as 7 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 8 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 9 be ninety-four percent. 10 (11) For valuations established for the assessment year 11 beginning January 1, 2036, the percentage of actual value as 12 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 13 441.49 at which residential property shall be assessed shall 14 be ninety-seven percent. 15 (12) For valuations established for the assessment year 16 beginning January 1, 2037, and each assessment year thereafter, 17 the percentage of actual value as equalized by the department 18 of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which residential 19 property shall be assessed shall be one hundred percent. 20 5. a. (1) For valuations established as of January 1, 21 1979, property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 22 chapter 437 shall be considered as one class of property and 23 shall be assessed as a percentage of its actual value. The 24 percentage shall be determined by the director of revenue in 25 accordance with the provisions of this section . For valuations 26 established as of January 1, 1979, the percentage shall be 27 the quotient of the dividend and divisor as defined in this 28 section . The dividend shall be the total actual valuation 29 established for 1978 by the department of revenue, plus ten 30 percent of the amount so determined. The divisor for property 31 valued by the department of revenue pursuant to chapter 437 32 shall be the valuation established for 1978, plus the amount of 33 value added to the total actual value by the revaluation of the 34 property by the department of revenue as of January 1, 1979. 35 -36- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 36/ 103 S.F. _____ For valuations established as of January 1, 1980, property 1 valued by the department of revenue pursuant to chapter 437 2 shall be assessed at a percentage of its actual value. The 3 percentage shall be determined by the director of revenue in 4 accordance with the provisions of this section . For valuations 5 established as of January 1, 1980, the percentage shall be 6 the quotient of the dividend and divisor as defined in this 7 section . The dividend shall be the total actual valuation 8 established for 1979 by the department of revenue, plus eight 9 percent of the amount so determined. The divisor for property 10 valued by the department of revenue pursuant to chapter 437 11 shall be the valuation established for 1979, plus the amount of 12 value added to the total actual value by the revaluation of the 13 property by the department of revenue as of January 1, 1980. 14 For valuations established as of January 1, 1981, and each year 15 thereafter, the percentage of actual value at which property 16 valued by the department of revenue pursuant to chapter 437 17 shall be assessed shall be calculated in accordance with the 18 methods provided herein, except that any references to ten 19 percent in this subsection shall be eight percent. 20 (2) (1) For valuations established on or after January 1, 21 2013, property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 22 chapter 434 shall be assessed at a portion of its actual value 23 determined in the same manner at which property assessed as 24 commercial property is assessed under paragraph âbâ for the same 25 assessment year. 26 (3) (2) For valuations established for the assessment year 27 beginning January 1, 2025, the percentage of actual value at 28 which property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 29 chapters 428 and 438 shall be assessed shall be ninety-eight 30 percent. 31 (4) (3) For valuations established for the assessment year 32 beginning January 1, 2026, and each assessment year thereafter, 33 the percentage of actual value at which property valued by the 34 department of revenue pursuant to chapters 428 , 437, and 438 35 -37- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 37/ 103 S.F. _____ shall be assessed shall be ninety-six one hundred percent. 1 (5) For valuations established for the assessment year 2 beginning January 1, 2027, the percentage of actual value at 3 which property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 4 chapters 428 and 438 shall be assessed shall be ninety-four 5 percent. 6 (6) For valuations established for the assessment year 7 beginning January 1, 2028, the percentage of actual value at 8 which property valued by the department of revenue pursuant 9 to chapters 428 and 438 shall be assessed shall be ninety-two 10 percent. 11 (7) For valuations established on or after January 1, 2029, 12 the percentage of actual value at which property valued by the 13 department of revenue pursuant to chapters 428 and 438 shall be 14 assessed shall be ninety percent. 15 b. For valuations established on or after January 1, 2013, 16 commercial Commercial property, excluding properties referred 17 to in section 427A.1, subsection 9 , shall be assessed at a 18 portion of its actual value, as determined in this paragraph 19 âbâ . 20 (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 21 beginning January 1, 2013, the percentage of actual value 22 as equalized by the department of revenue as provided in 23 section 441.49 at which commercial property shall be assessed 24 shall be ninety-five percent. For valuations established 25 for the assessment year beginning January 1, 2014, and each 26 assessment year thereafter beginning before January 1, 2022, 27 the percentage of actual value as equalized by the department 28 of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which commercial 29 property shall be assessed shall be ninety percent. 30 (2) (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 31 beginning January 1, 2022, and each assessment year thereafter 32 beginning before January 1, 2026 , the portion of actual value 33 at which each property unit of commercial property shall be 34 assessed shall be the sum of the following: 35 -38- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 38/ 103 S.F. _____ (a) An amount equal to the product of the assessment 1 limitation percentage applicable to residential property under 2 subsection 4 for that assessment year multiplied by the actual 3 value of the property that exceeds zero dollars but does not 4 exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars. 5 (b) An amount equal to ninety percent of the actual value of 6 the property for that assessment year that exceeds one hundred 7 fifty thousand dollars. 8 (2) For valuations established for the assessment year 9 beginning January 1, 2026, and each assessment year thereafter, 10 the percentage of actual value as equalized by the department 11 of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which commercial 12 property shall be assessed shall be one hundred percent. 13 c. For valuations established on or after January 1, 2013, 14 industrial Industrial property, excluding properties referred 15 to in section 427A.1, subsection 9 , shall be assessed at a 16 portion of its actual value, as determined in this paragraph 17 âcâ . 18 (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 19 beginning January 1, 2013, the percentage of actual value 20 as equalized by the department of revenue as provided in 21 section 441.49 at which industrial property shall be assessed 22 shall be ninety-five percent. For valuations established 23 for the assessment year beginning January 1, 2014, and each 24 assessment year thereafter beginning before January 1, 2022, 25 the percentage of actual value as equalized by the department 26 of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which industrial 27 property shall be assessed shall be ninety percent. 28 (2) (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 29 beginning January 1, 2022, and each assessment year thereafter 30 beginning before January 1, 2026 , the portion of actual value 31 at which each property unit of industrial property shall be 32 assessed shall be the sum of the following: 33 (a) An amount equal to the product of the assessment 34 limitation percentage applicable to residential property under 35 -39- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 39/ 103 S.F. _____ subsection 4 for that assessment year multiplied by the actual 1 value of the property that exceeds zero dollars but does not 2 exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars. 3 (b) An amount equal to ninety percent of the actual value of 4 the property for that assessment year that exceeds one hundred 5 fifty thousand dollars. 6 (2) For valuations established for the assessment year 7 beginning January 1, 2026, and each assessment year thereafter, 8 the percentage of actual value as equalized by the department 9 of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at which industrial 10 property shall be assessed shall be one hundred percent. 11 d. For valuations established for the assessment year 12 beginning January 1, 2019, and each assessment year thereafter 13 beginning before January 1, 2026 , the percentages or portions 14 of actual value at which property is assessed, as determined 15 under this subsection , shall not be applied to the value of 16 wind energy conversion property valued under section 427B.26 17 the construction of which is approved by the Iowa utilities 18 commission on or after July 1, 2018. 19 e. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2023, 20 there is appropriated from the general fund of the state to 21 the department of revenue the sum of one hundred twenty-two 22 million three hundred fifty thousand dollars to be used 23 for payments under this paragraph calculated as a result 24 of the assessment limitations imposed under paragraph âbâ , 25 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), and paragraph 26 âcâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a). For each 27 fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2024, but before 28 July 1, 2027, there is appropriated from the general fund of 29 the state to the department of revenue the sum of one hundred 30 twenty-five million dollars to be used for payments under this 31 paragraph calculated as a result of the assessment limitations 32 imposed under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph 33 division (a), Code 2026, and paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), 34 subparagraph division (a) , Code 2026 . 35 -40- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 40/ 103 S.F. _____ (2) For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2023, but 1 before July 1, 2027, each county treasurer shall be paid by the 2 department of revenue an amount calculated under subparagraph 3 (4) for the applicable fiscal year . If an amount appropriated 4 for the fiscal year is insufficient to make all payments as 5 calculated under subparagraph (4), the director of revenue 6 shall prorate the payments to the county treasurers and shall 7 notify the county auditors of the pro rata percentage on or 8 before September 30. 9 (3) On or before July 1 of each applicable fiscal year, the 10 assessor shall report to the county auditor that portion of the 11 total actual value of all commercial property and industrial 12 property in the county that is subject to the assessment 13 limitations imposed under paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), 14 subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, and paragraph âcâ , 15 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, for the 16 assessment year used to calculate the taxes due and payable in 17 that fiscal year. 18 (4) On or before September 1 of each applicable fiscal year, 19 the county auditor shall prepare a statement, based on the 20 report received in subparagraph (3) and information transmitted 21 to the county auditor under chapter 434 , listing for each 22 taxing district in the county: 23 (a) The product of the portion of the total actual value 24 of all commercial property, industrial property, and property 25 valued by the department under chapter 434 in the county 26 that is subject to the assessment limitations imposed under 27 paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), 28 Code 2026, and paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph 29 division (a), Code 2026, for the applicable assessment year 30 used to calculate taxes which are due and payable in the 31 applicable fiscal year multiplied by the difference, stated 32 as a percentage, between ninety percent and the assessment 33 limitation percentage applicable to residential property under 34 subsection 4 for the applicable assessment year. 35 -41- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 41/ 103 S.F. _____ (b) The tax levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed 1 value for each taxing district for the applicable fiscal year. 2 (c) The amount of the payment for each county is equal to 3 the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph division (a), 4 multiplied by the tax rate specified in subparagraph division 5 (b), and then divided by one thousand dollars. 6 (5) The county auditor shall certify and forward one copy of 7 the statement described in subparagraph (4) to the department 8 of revenue not later than September 1 of each fiscal year. 9 (6) The amounts determined under this paragraph shall 10 be paid by the department to the county treasurers in equal 11 installments in September and March of each year. The county 12 treasurer shall apportion the payments among the eligible 13 taxing districts in the county and the amounts received by each 14 taxing authority shall be treated the same as property taxes 15 paid. 16 f. For the purposes of this subsection , unless the context 17 otherwise requires: 18 (1) âContiguous parcelsâ means any of the following: 19 (a) Parcels that share a common boundary. 20 (b) Parcels within the same building or structure 21 regardless of whether the parcels share a common boundary. 22 (c) Permanent improvements to the land that are situated 23 on one or more parcels of land that are assessed and taxed 24 separately from the permanent improvements if the parcels of 25 land upon which the permanent improvements are situated share 26 a common boundary. 27 (2) âParcelâ means the same as defined in section 445.1 . 28 âParcelâ also means that portion of a parcel assigned a 29 classification of commercial property or industrial property 30 pursuant to section 441.21, subsection 14, paragraph âbâ , Code 31 2026 . 32 (3) âProperty unitâ means a parcel or contiguous parcels 33 all of which are located within the same county, with the same 34 property tax classification, are owned by the same person, and 35 -42- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 42/ 103 S.F. _____ are operated by that person for a common use and purpose. 1 Sec. 57. Section 441.21, subsection 8, paragraph b, Code 2 2026, is amended to read as follows: 3 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , any construction or 4 installation of a solar energy system on property classified 5 as agricultural, residential, multiresidential, commercial, or 6 industrial property shall not increase the actual, assessed, 7 and taxable values of the property for five full assessment 8 years. 9 Sec. 58. Section 441.21, subsections 9 and 10, Code 2026, 10 are amended to read as follows: 11 9. Not later than November 1, 1979 2026 , and November 12 1 of each subsequent year, the director shall certify to 13 the county auditor of each county the percentages of actual 14 value at which residential property, agricultural property, 15 commercial property, industrial property, property valued by 16 the department of revenue pursuant to chapters 428 and 438, 17 property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 18 chapter 434, and property valued by the department of revenue 19 pursuant to chapter 437 in each assessing jurisdiction in 20 the county each classification of property shall be assessed 21 for taxation , including for assessment years beginning on 22 or after January 1, 2022, the percentages used to apply the 23 assessment limitations under subsection 5, paragraphs âbâ 24 and âcâ . The county auditor shall proceed to determine the 25 assessed values of agricultural property, residential property, 26 commercial property, industrial property, property valued by 27 the department of revenue pursuant to chapters 428 and 438, 28 property valued by the department of revenue pursuant to 29 chapter 434, and property valued by the department of revenue 30 pursuant to chapter 437 by applying such percentages to the 31 current actual value of such property, as reported to the 32 county auditor by the assessor, and the assessed values so 33 determined shall be the taxable values of such properties upon 34 which the levy shall be made. 35 -43- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 43/ 103 S.F. _____ 10. The percentages percentage of actual value computed by 1 the department of revenue under subsection 4 for agricultural 2 property , residential property, commercial property, industrial 3 property, property valued by the department of revenue pursuant 4 to chapters 428 and 438 , property valued by the department of 5 revenue pursuant to chapter 434 , and property valued by the 6 department of revenue pursuant to chapter 437 , including for 7 assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, the 8 percentages used to apply the assessment limitations under 9 subsection 5 , paragraphs âbâ and âcâ , and used to determine 10 assessed values of those classes of agricultural property 11 do does not constitute a rule as defined in section 17A.2, 12 subsection 11 . 13 Sec. 59. Section 441.21, subsection 13, paragraph a, 14 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 15 follows: 16 Beginning with valuations established on or after January 17 1, 2016 2027 , but before January 1, 2022, all of the following 18 shall be valued as a separate class of property known as 19 multiresidential property and, excluding properties referred 20 to in section 427A.1, subsection 9 , shall be assessed at 21 a percentage of its actual value, as determined in this 22 subsection : 23 Sec. 60. Section 441.21, subsection 13, paragraph b, Code 24 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 25 lieu thereof the following: 26 b. (1) For valuations established for the assessment year 27 beginning January 1, 2027, the percentage of actual value as 28 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 29 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 30 shall be seventy percent. 31 (2) For valuations established for the assessment year 32 beginning January 1, 2028, the percentage of actual value as 33 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 34 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 35 -44- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 44/ 103 S.F. _____ shall be seventy-three percent. 1 (3) For valuations established for the assessment year 2 beginning January 1, 2029, the percentage of actual value as 3 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 4 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 5 shall be seventy-six percent. 6 (4) For valuations established for the assessment year 7 beginning January 1, 2030, the percentage of actual value as 8 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 9 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 10 shall be seventy-nine percent. 11 (5) For valuations established for the assessment year 12 beginning January 1, 2031, the percentage of actual value as 13 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 14 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 15 shall be eighty-two percent. 16 (6) For valuations established for the assessment year 17 beginning January 1, 2032, the percentage of actual value as 18 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 19 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 20 shall be eighty-five percent. 21 (7) For valuations established for the assessment year 22 beginning January 1, 2033, the percentage of actual value as 23 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 24 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 25 shall be eighty-eight percent. 26 (8) For valuations established for the assessment year 27 beginning January 1, 2034, the percentage of actual value as 28 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 29 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 30 shall be ninety-one percent. 31 (9) For valuations established for the assessment year 32 beginning January 1, 2035, the percentage of actual value as 33 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 34 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 35 -45- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 45/ 103 S.F. _____ shall be ninety-four percent. 1 (10) For valuations established for the assessment year 2 beginning January 1, 2036, the percentage of actual value as 3 equalized by the department of revenue as provided in section 4 441.49 at which multiresidential property shall be assessed 5 shall be ninety-seven percent. 6 (11) For valuations established for the assessment 7 year beginning January 1, 2037, and each assessment year 8 thereafter, the percentage of actual value as equalized by 9 the department of revenue as provided in section 441.49 at 10 which multiresidential property shall be assessed shall be one 11 hundred percent. 12 Sec. 61. Section 441.21, subsection 13, paragraph c, Code 13 2026, is amended to read as follows: 14 c. Beginning with valuations established on or after 15 January 1, 2016 2027 , but before January 1, 2022, for parcels 16 for which a portion of the parcel satisfies the requirements 17 for classification as multiresidential property pursuant to 18 paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (5) or (6), the assessor shall 19 assign to that portion of the parcel the classification 20 of multiresidential property and to such other portions of 21 the parcel the property classification for which such other 22 portions qualify. 23 Sec. 62. Section 441.21, subsection 13, Code 2026, is 24 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 25 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. For purposes of equalization under 26 sections 441.47 through 441.49, multiresidential property shall 27 be considered residential property. 28 Sec. 63. Section 441.21, subsection 14, Code 2026, is 29 amended to read as follows: 30 14. a. Beginning with valuations established on or after 31 January 1, 2022 2027 , all of the following property primarily 32 used or intended for human habitation containing two or fewer 33 dwelling units shall be classified and valued as residential 34 property : . 35 -46- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 46/ 103 S.F. _____ (1) Property primarily used or intended for human 1 habitation containing two or fewer dwelling units. 2 (2) Mobile home parks. 3 (3) Manufactured home communities. 4 (4) Land-leased communities. 5 (5) Assisted living facilities. 6 (6) A parcel primarily used or intended for human habitation 7 containing three or more separate dwelling units. If a 8 portion of such a parcel is used or intended for a purpose 9 that, if the primary use, would be classified as commercial 10 property or industrial property, each such portion, including 11 a proportionate share of the land included in the parcel, if 12 applicable, shall be assigned the appropriate classification 13 pursuant to paragraph âbâ . 14 (7) For a parcel that is primarily used or intended for use 15 as commercial property or industrial property, that portion 16 of the parcel that is used or intended for human habitation, 17 regardless of the number of dwelling units contained on the 18 parcel, including a proportionate share of the land included 19 in the parcel, if applicable. The portion of such a parcel 20 used or intended for use as commercial property or industrial 21 property, including a proportionate share of the land included 22 in the parcel, if applicable, shall be assigned the appropriate 23 classification pursuant to paragraph âbâ . 24 b. Beginning with valuations established on or after 25 January 1, 2022, for parcels for which a portion of the parcel 26 satisfies the requirements for classification as residential 27 property pursuant to paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (6) or (7), 28 the assessor shall assign to that portion of the parcel the 29 classification of residential property and to such other 30 portions of the parcel the property classification for which 31 such other portions qualify. 32 c. Property that is rented or leased to low-income 33 individuals and families as authorized by section 42 of the 34 Internal Revenue Code , and that has not been withdrawn from 35 -47- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 47/ 103 S.F. _____ section 42 assessment procedures under subsection 2 of this 1 section , or a hotel, motel, inn, or other building where rooms 2 or dwelling units are usually rented for less than one month 3 shall not be classified as residential property under this 4 subsection . 5 d. As used in this subsection : 6 (1) âAssisted living facilityâ means property for providing 7 assisted living as defined in section 231C.2 . âAssisted living 8 facilityâ also includes a health care facility, as defined in 9 section 135C.1 , an elder group home, as defined in section 10 231B.1 , a child foster care facility under chapter 237 , or 11 property used for a hospice program as defined in section 12 135J.1 . 13 (2) âDwelling unitâ means an apartment, group of rooms, 14 or single room which is occupied as separate living quarters 15 or, if vacant, is intended for occupancy as separate living 16 quarters, in which a tenant can live and sleep separately from 17 any other persons in the building. 18 (3) âLand-leased communityâ means the same as defined in 19 sections 335.30A and 414.28A . 20 (4) âManufactured home communityâ means the same as a 21 land-leased community. 22 (5) âMobile home parkâ means the same as defined in section 23 435.1 . 24 Sec. 64. Section 558.46, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 25 following new subsection: 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. For the purposes of this section, 27 âresidential propertyâ includes multiresidential property. 28 Sec. 65. SAVINGS PROVISION. This division of this Act, 29 pursuant to section 4.13, does not affect the operation of, 30 or prohibit the application of, prior provisions of section 31 441.21, or rules adopted under chapter 17A to administer prior 32 provisions of section 441.21, for assessment years beginning 33 before January 1, 2026, or for duties, powers, protests, 34 appeals, proceedings, actions, or remedies attributable to an 35 -48- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 48/ 103 S.F. _____ assessment year beginning before January 1, 2026, including 1 property taxes due and payable in a fiscal year as the result 2 of an assessment year beginning before January 1, 2026. 3 Sec. 66. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following take effect January 4 1, 2027: 5 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 6 386.8. 7 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 8 386.9. 9 3. The section of this division of this Act amending section 10 386.10. 11 4. The section of this division of this Act amending section 12 404.2, subsection 2, paragraph âfâ. 13 5. The section of this division of this Act amending section 14 404.3, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ. 15 6. The section of this division of this Act amending section 16 404.3A. 17 7. The section of this division of this Act amending section 18 404.3D. 19 8. The section of this division of this Act amending section 20 441.21, subsection 2. 21 9. The section of this division of this Act amending section 22 441.21, subsection 8, paragraph âbâ. 23 10. The sections of this division of this Act amending 24 section 441.21, subsection 13. 25 11. The section of this division of this Act amending 26 section 441.21, subsection 14. 27 12. The section of this division of this Act amending 28 section 558.46. 29 Sec. 67. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. Except as otherwise 30 provided in this division of this Act, this division of this 31 Act applies retroactively to assessment years beginning on or 32 after January 1, 2026. 33 Sec. 68. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to assessment 34 years beginning on or after January 1, 2027: 35 -49- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 49/ 103 S.F. _____ 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 1 386.8. 2 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 3 386.9. 4 3. The section of this division of this Act amending section 5 386.10. 6 4. The section of this division of this Act amending section 7 404.2, subsection 2, paragraph âfâ. 8 5. The section of this division of this Act amending section 9 404.3, subsection 4, paragraph âaâ. 10 6. The section of this division of this Act amending section 11 404.3A. 12 7. The section of this division of this Act amending section 13 404.3D. 14 8. The section of this division of this Act amending section 15 441.21, subsection 2. 16 9. The section of this division of this Act amending section 17 441.21, subsection 8, paragraph âbâ. 18 10. The sections of this division of this Act amending 19 section 441.21, subsection 13. 20 11. The section of this division of this Act amending 21 section 441.21, subsection 14. 22 12. The section of this division of this Act amending 23 section 558.46. 24 DIVISION V 25 DISABLED VETERAN AND HOMESTEAD CREDITS AND EXEMPTIONS 26 Sec. 69. Section 25B.7, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 27 2026, is amended to read as follows: 28 a. Homestead tax credit pursuant to section 425.1 , and 29 sections 425.2 through 425.13 , and section 425.15 . 30 Sec. 70. Section 425.1, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 31 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 32 following: 33 2. a. The homestead credit fund shall be apportioned each 34 year so as to give a credit against the tax on each eligible 35 -50- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 50/ 103 S.F. _____ homestead in the state equal to the amounts specified pursuant 1 to paragraph âbâ or âcâ , as applicable. 2 b. (1) If the owner of a homestead allowed a credit under 3 this subchapter is any of the following, the homestead credit 4 allowed on the homestead shall be the entire amount of tax 5 levied on the homestead: 6 (a) A veteran of any of the military forces of the United 7 States who acquired the homestead under 38 U.S.C. Â§21.801, 8 21.802 prior to August 6, 1991, or under 38 U.S.C. Â§2101, 2102. 9 (b) A veteran as defined in section 35.1 with a permanent 10 service-connected disability rating of one hundred percent, as 11 certified by the United States department of veterans affairs, 12 or a permanent and total disability rating based on individual 13 unemployability that is compensated at the one hundred percent 14 disability rate, as certified by the United States department 15 of veterans affairs. 16 (c) A former member of the national guard of any state 17 who otherwise meets the service requirements of section 35.1, 18 subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2) or (7), with a 19 permanent service-connected disability rating of one hundred 20 percent, as certified by the United States department of 21 veterans affairs, or a permanent and total disability rating 22 based on individual unemployability that is compensated at the 23 one hundred percent disability rate, as certified by the United 24 States department of veterans affairs. 25 (d) An individual who is a surviving spouse or a child and 26 who is receiving dependency and indemnity compensation pursuant 27 to 38 U.S.C. Â§1301 et seq., as certified by the United States 28 department of veterans affairs. 29 (2) (a) For an owner described in subparagraph (1), 30 subparagraph division (a), (b), or (c), the credit allowed 31 shall be continued to the estate of an owner who is deceased 32 or the surviving spouse and any child, as defined in section 33 234.1, who are the beneficiaries of a deceased owner, so long 34 as the surviving spouse remains unmarried. 35 -51- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 51/ 103 S.F. _____ (b) An individual described in subparagraph (1), 1 subparagraph division (d), is no longer eligible for the credit 2 upon termination of dependency and indemnity compensation under 3 38 U.S.C. Â§1301 et seq. 4 (3) An owner or a beneficiary of an owner who elects to 5 secure the credit provided in this paragraph is not eligible 6 for the credit provided in paragraph âcâ or any other real 7 property tax credit or exemption provided by law for veterans 8 of military service. 9 (4) If an owner acquires a different homestead, the 10 credit allowed under this paragraph may be claimed on the new 11 homestead unless the owner fails to meet the other requirements 12 of this paragraph. 13 (5) (a) Except as provided in subparagraph division (b), 14 the list of the names and addresses of individuals allowed 15 a credit under this paragraph and maintained by the county 16 recorder, county treasurer, county assessor, city assessor, or 17 other government body is confidential information and shall 18 not be disseminated to any person unless otherwise ordered by 19 a court or released by the lawful custodian of the records 20 pursuant to state or federal law. The county recorder, county 21 treasurer, county assessor, city assessor, or other government 22 body responsible for maintaining the names and addresses 23 of individuals allowed a credit under this paragraph may 24 display such credit on individual paper records and individual 25 electronic records, including display on an internet site. 26 (b) Upon request, a county recorder, county assessor, city 27 assessor, or other entity may share information as described in 28 subparagraph division (a) to a county veterans service officer 29 for purposes of providing information on benefits and services 30 available to veterans and their families. 31 (6) (a) For an owner who makes an application to secure 32 the credit provided in this paragraph before July 1, 2026, 33 and for the beneficiary of such an owner, âhomesteadâ shall 34 mean the same as defined in section 425.11 for each succeeding 35 -52- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 52/ 103 S.F. _____ assessment year. 1 (b) For an owner who makes an application to secure the 2 credit provided in this paragraph on or after July 1, 2026, and 3 for the beneficiary of such an owner, âhomesteadâ shall mean the 4 same as provided in section 425.11, except the homestead shall 5 not include appurtenances and shall not exceed one-half acre. 6 (7) For purposes of this paragraph, âpermanent and total 7 disability rating based on individual unemployabilityâ means 8 a condition under which a person has either a permanent 9 service-connected disability rating of sixty percent or two or 10 more permanent service-connected disability conditions in which 11 one of the conditions has at least a forty percent rating and 12 the combined rating for all the conditions is at least seventy 13 percent, and the person has an administrative adjustment added 14 to the service-connected disability rating, due to individual 15 unemployability, such that the United States department of 16 veterans affairs rates the veteran permanently and totally 17 disabled for purposes of disability compensation. 18 c. (1) For assessment years beginning prior to January 19 1, 2026, unless eligible under section 425.15, Code 2026, an 20 amount equal to the actual levy on the first four thousand 21 eight hundred fifty dollars of actual value for each homestead. 22 (2) For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2026, 23 and each assessment year thereafter, unless eligible under 24 paragraph âbâ , zero. 25 Sec. 71. Section 425.1A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 26 to read as follows: 27 1. The following exemptions from taxation shall be 28 allowed in addition to following application of the homestead 29 credit exemption under subsection 1A and the exemption under 30 subsection 1B, if applicable, for an owner that has attained 31 the age of sixty-five years by January 1 of the assessment 32 year: 33 a. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2023, the 34 eligible homestead, not to exceed three thousand two hundred 35 -53- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 53/ 103 S.F. _____ fifty dollars in taxable value. 1 b. For the assessment year years beginning on or after 2 January 1, 2024, and each succeeding assessment year, the 3 eligible homestead, not to exceed six thousand five hundred 4 dollars in taxable value. 5 Sec. 72. Section 425.1A, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsections: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. a. For the assessment year beginning 8 January 1, 2026, an exemption from taxation of twenty-five 9 percent of taxable value, not to exceed an exemption of one 10 hundred seventy-five thousand dollars in taxable value, shall 11 be allowed on each eligible homestead. 12 b. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2027, an 13 exemption from taxation of twenty-seven and one-half percent 14 of taxable value, not to exceed an exemption of one hundred 15 ninety-two thousand five hundred dollars in taxable value, 16 shall be allowed on each eligible homestead. 17 c. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2028, an 18 exemption from taxation of thirty percent of taxable value, not 19 to exceed an exemption of two hundred ten thousand dollars in 20 taxable value, shall be allowed on each eligible homestead. 21 d. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2029, an 22 exemption from taxation of thirty-two and one-half percent 23 of taxable value, not to exceed an exemption of two hundred 24 twenty-seven thousand five hundred dollars in taxable value, 25 shall be allowed on each eligible homestead. 26 e. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2030, an 27 exemption from taxation of thirty-five percent of taxable 28 value, not to exceed an exemption of two hundred forty-five 29 thousand dollars in taxable value, shall be allowed on each 30 eligible homestead. 31 f. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2031, an 32 exemption from taxation of thirty-seven and one-half percent 33 of taxable value, not to exceed an exemption of two hundred 34 sixty-two thousand five hundred dollars in taxable value, shall 35 -54- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 54/ 103 S.F. _____ be allowed on each eligible homestead. 1 g. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2032, an 2 exemption from taxation of forty percent of taxable value, not 3 to exceed an exemption of two hundred eighty thousand dollars 4 in taxable value, shall be allowed on each eligible homestead. 5 h. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2033, an 6 exemption from taxation of forty-two and one-half percent 7 of taxable value, not to exceed an exemption of two hundred 8 ninety-seven thousand five hundred dollars in taxable value, 9 shall be allowed on each eligible homestead. 10 i. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2034, an 11 exemption from taxation of forty-five percent of taxable value, 12 not to exceed an exemption of three hundred fifteen thousand 13 dollars in taxable value, shall be allowed on each eligible 14 homestead. 15 j. For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2035, an 16 exemption from taxation of forty-seven and one-half percent 17 of taxable value, not to exceed an exemption of three hundred 18 thirty-two thousand five hundred dollars in taxable value, 19 shall be allowed on each eligible homestead. 20 k. For each assessment year beginning on or after January 1, 21 2036, an exemption from taxation of fifty percent of taxable 22 value, not to exceed an exemption of three hundred fifty 23 thousand dollars in taxable value, shall be allowed on each 24 eligible homestead. 25 NEW SUBSECTION . 1B. a. For purposes of this subsection: 26 (1) âMortgageâ means the same as defined in section 27 554.9102. 28 (2) âUnencumbered homesteadâ means a homestead as defined in 29 section 425.11, but excluding appurtenances and that portion of 30 the land upon which the dwelling house is situated that exceeds 31 one-half acre, owned by an individual that has attained the 32 age of sixty years by January 1 of the applicable assessment 33 year and for which no mortgage or other indebtedness or account 34 secured by an interest in the homestead exists on January 1 of 35 -55- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 55/ 103 S.F. _____ the assessment year. 1 b. (1) For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2026, 2 if the homestead is an unencumbered homestead, an exemption 3 from taxation of twenty-five percent of the taxable value 4 following application of the exemption under subsection 1A, but 5 before the exemption under subsection 1, if applicable. 6 (2) For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2027, 7 if the homestead is an unencumbered homestead, an exemption 8 from taxation of fifty percent of the taxable value following 9 application of the exemption under subsection 1A, but before 10 the exemption under subsection 1, if applicable. 11 (3) For the assessment year beginning January 1, 2028, if 12 the homestead is an unencumbered homestead, an exemption from 13 taxation of seventy-five percent of the taxable value following 14 application of the exemption under subsection 1A, but before 15 the exemption under subsection 1, if applicable. 16 (4) For each assessment year beginning on or after January 17 1, 2029, if the homestead is an unencumbered homestead, an 18 exemption from taxation of one hundred percent of the taxable 19 value following application of the exemption under subsection 20 1A, but before the exemption under subsection 1, if applicable. 21 c. The exemption under this subsection shall not apply 22 to voter-approved levies or property tax levies, or portions 23 thereof, that are for the payment of voter-approved bonds 24 or other voter-approved indebtedness. For purposes of this 25 subsection, âvoter-approved levyâ means a levy under chapter 26 28E, subchapter II, section 260C.22, section 260C.28, chapter 27 300, section 384.7, chapter 386, section 422D.5, and the 28 voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy under section 29 298.2. 30 Sec. 73. Section 425.1A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 2. Section 25B.7, subsection 1 , shall not apply to the 33 property tax exemption exemptions provided in this section . 34 Sec. 74. Section 425.2, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are 35 -56- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 56/ 103 S.F. _____ amended to read as follows: 1 1. A person who wishes to qualify for the homestead credit 2 or exemptions allowed under this subchapter shall obtain the 3 appropriate forms for filing for the credit from the assessor. 4 The forms shall include the ability to claim the credit under 5 section 425.1 and the exemptions under section 425.1A. 6 However, a separate form shall be required for claiming a 7 credit under section 425.1, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ . The 8 person claiming the credit or exemption shall file a verified 9 statement and designation of homestead with the assessor for 10 the year for which the person is first claiming the credit 11 or exemption . The claim shall be filed not later than July 12 1 of the year for which the person is claiming the credit or 13 exemption . A claim filed after July 1 of the year for which the 14 person is claiming the credit or exemption shall be considered 15 as a claim filed for the following year. 16 2. Upon the filing and allowance of the claim, the claim 17 shall be allowed on that homestead for successive years without 18 further filing as long as the property is legally or equitably 19 owned and used as a homestead by that person or that personâs 20 spouse on July 1 of each of those successive years, and the 21 owner of the property being claimed as a homestead declares 22 residency in Iowa for purposes of income taxation, and the 23 property is occupied by that person or that personâs spouse 24 for at least six months in each of those calendar years in 25 which the fiscal year begins. When the property is sold or 26 transferred, the buyer or transferee who wishes to qualify 27 shall refile for the credit or exemption . However, when the 28 property is transferred as part of a distribution made pursuant 29 to chapter 598 , the transferee who is the spouse retaining 30 ownership of the property is not required to refile for the 31 credit or exemption . Property divided pursuant to chapter 598 32 shall not be modified following the division of the property. 33 An owner who ceases to use a property for a homestead or 34 intends not to use it as a homestead for at least six months in 35 -57- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 57/ 103 S.F. _____ a calendar year shall provide written notice to the assessor 1 by July 1 following the date on which the use is changed. A 2 person who sells or transfers a homestead or the personal 3 representative of a deceased person who had a homestead at the 4 time of death, shall provide written notice to the assessor 5 that the property is no longer the homestead of the former 6 claimant. 7 Sec. 75. Section 425.2, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 8 by striking the subsection. 9 Sec. 76. Section 425.2, subsections 5 and 6, Code 2026, are 10 amended to read as follows: 11 5. Any person sixty-five years of age or older or any person 12 who is disabled may request, in writing, from the appropriate 13 assessor forms for filing for homestead tax credit . Any 14 person sixty-five years of age or older or who is disabled 15 may complete the form, which shall include a statement of 16 homestead, and mail or return it to the appropriate assessor. 17 The signature of the claimant on the statement shall be 18 considered the claimantâs acknowledgment that all statements 19 and facts entered on the form are correct to the best of the 20 claimantâs knowledge. 21 6. Upon adoption of a resolution by the county board 22 of supervisors, any person may request, in writing, from 23 the appropriate assessor forms for the filing for homestead 24 tax credit . The person may complete the form, which shall 25 include a statement of homestead, and mail or return it to 26 the appropriate assessor. The signature of the claimant on 27 the statement of homestead shall be considered the claimantâs 28 acknowledgment that all statements and facts entered on the 29 form are correct to the best of the claimantâs knowledge. 30 Sec. 77. Section 425.8, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 1. The director of revenue shall prescribe the form 33 for the making of a verified statement and designation of 34 homestead, the form for the supporting affidavits required 35 -58- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 58/ 103 S.F. _____ herein, and such other forms as may be necessary for the proper 1 administration of this subchapter . Whenever necessary, the 2 department of revenue shall forward to the county auditors of 3 the several counties in the state the prescribed sample forms, 4 and the county auditors shall furnish blank forms prepared in 5 accordance therewith with the assessment rolls, books, and 6 supplies delivered to the assessors. The department of revenue 7 shall prescribe and the county auditors shall provide on the 8 forms for claiming the homestead credit a statement to the 9 effect that the owner realizes that the owner must give written 10 notice to the assessor when the owner changes the use of the 11 property. 12 Sec. 78. Section 425.11, subsection 1, paragraph d, 13 subparagraph (1), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended 14 to read as follows: 15 The homestead includes the dwelling house which the owner, 16 in good faith, is occupying as a home on July 1 of the year for 17 which the credit or exemption is claimed and occupies as a home 18 for at least six months during the calendar year in which the 19 fiscal year begins, except as otherwise provided. 20 Sec. 79. Section 425.11, subsection 1, paragraph d, 21 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 (3) It must not embrace more than one dwelling house, but 23 where a homestead has more than one dwelling house situated 24 thereon, the exemption and or credit provided for in this 25 subchapter shall apply to the home and buildings used by the 26 owner, but shall not apply to any other dwelling house and 27 buildings appurtenant. 28 Sec. 80. Section 425.11, subsection 1, paragraph e, 29 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 30 (2) For the purpose of this subchapter , the word âownerâ 31 shall be construed to mean a bona fide owner and not one for 32 the purpose only of availing the person of the benefits of this 33 subchapter . In order to qualify for the homestead tax credit 34 and or exemption, evidence of ownership shall be on file in the 35 -59- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 59/ 103 S.F. _____ office of the clerk of the district court or recorded in the 1 office of the county recorder at the time the owner files with 2 the assessor a verified statement of the homestead claimed by 3 the owner as provided in section 425.2 . 4 Sec. 81. Section 483A.24, subsection 20, Code 2026, is 5 amended to read as follows: 6 20. Upon payment of a fee established by rules adopted 7 pursuant to section 483A.1 for a lifetime trout fishing 8 license, the department shall issue a lifetime trout fishing 9 license to a person who is at least sixty-five years of age or 10 to a person who qualifies for the disabled veteran homestead 11 credit under section 425.15 425.1, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ . 12 The department shall prepare an application to be used by a 13 person requesting a lifetime trout fishing license under this 14 subsection . 15 Sec. 82. REPEAL. Section 425.15, Code 2026, is repealed. 16 Sec. 83. IMPLEMENTATION. Homestead owners who have filed 17 for or that are receiving homestead credits or exemptions under 18 chapter 425, subchapter I, before the effective date of this 19 division of this Act shall continue to receive such credits and 20 exemptions for which the owner is eligible for assessment years 21 beginning on or after January 1, 2026, without refiling, and, 22 if the owner is eligible, shall receive the exemption under 23 section 425.1A, subsection 1A, as enacted in this division of 24 this Act, without filing for such exemption. 25 Sec. 84. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 26 Act applies retroactively to assessment years beginning on or 27 after January 1, 2026. 28 DIVISION VI 29 MILITARY SERVICE PROPERTY TAX EXEMPTION 30 Sec. 85. Section 426A.11, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 2. a. The property, not to exceed one thousand eight 33 hundred fifty-two dollars in taxable value for assessment years 34 beginning before January 1, 2023, of an honorably separated, 35 -60- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 60/ 103 S.F. _____ retired, furloughed to a reserve, placed on inactive status, 1 or discharged veteran, as defined in section 35.1, subsection 2 2 , paragraph âaâ or âbâ . 3 b. The property, not to exceed four thousand dollars in 4 taxable value for the assessment years beginning on or after 5 January 1, 2023, but before January 1, 2026, of an honorably 6 separated, retired, furloughed to a reserve, placed on inactive 7 status, or discharged veteran, as defined in section 35.1, 8 subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ or âbâ . 9 c. The property, not to exceed the following amounts in 10 taxable value, of an honorably separated, retired, furloughed 11 to a reserve, placed on inactive status, or discharged veteran, 12 as defined in section 35.1, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ or âbâ : 13 (1) Five thousand dollars in taxable value for the 14 assessment year beginning January 1, 2026. 15 (2) Six thousand dollars in taxable value for the assessment 16 year beginning January 1, 2027. 17 (3) Seven thousand dollars in taxable value for assessment 18 years beginning on or after January 1, 2028. 19 Sec. 86. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 20 Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2026, for assessment 21 years beginning on or after that date. 22 DIVISION VII 23 HOSPITAL AND EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES PROPERTY TAX LEVIES 24 Sec. 87. Section 347.7, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 25 following new subsection: 26 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. a. For fiscal years beginning on 27 or after July 1, 2027, any property tax levy imposed for a 28 county hospital under this chapter that is limited by law to 29 a specific property tax levy rate per one thousand dollars of 30 assessed value shall not exceed a levy rate per one thousand 31 dollars of assessed value that is equal to one thousand 32 multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the product of 33 the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the current fiscal 34 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy by 35 -61- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 61/ 103 S.F. _____ the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 1 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 2 valuation. 3 b. For purposes of this subsection, âbudget adjustment 4 factorâ , âbudget yearâ , âcurrent fiscal yearâ , and ânew 5 valuationâ mean the same as defined in section 331.423. 6 Sec. 88. Section 347A.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. For fiscal years beginning on 9 or after July 1, 2027, any property tax levy imposed for a 10 county hospital under this chapter that is limited by law to 11 a specific property tax levy rate per one thousand dollars of 12 assessed value shall not exceed a levy rate per one thousand 13 dollars of assessed value that is equal to one thousand 14 multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the product of 15 the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the current fiscal 16 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy by 17 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 18 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 19 valuation. 20 b. For purposes of this subsection, âbudget adjustment 21 factorâ , âbudget yearâ , âcurrent fiscal yearâ , and ânew 22 valuationâ mean the same as defined in section 331.423. 23 Sec. 89. Section 357F.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 24 following new subsection: 25 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. For fiscal years beginning on 26 or after July 1, 2027, any property tax levy imposed for 27 the district under this chapter that is limited by law to a 28 specific property tax levy rate per one thousand dollars of 29 assessed value shall not exceed a levy rate per one thousand 30 dollars of assessed value that is equal to one thousand 31 multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the product of 32 the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the current fiscal 33 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy by 34 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 35 -62- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 62/ 103 S.F. _____ such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 1 valuation. 2 b. For purposes of this subsection, âbudget adjustment 3 factorâ , âbudget yearâ , âcurrent fiscal yearâ , and ânew 4 valuationâ mean the same as defined in section 331.423. 5 Sec. 90. Section 357G.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. For fiscal years beginning on 8 or after July 1, 2027, any property tax levy imposed for 9 the district under this chapter that is limited by law to a 10 specific property tax levy rate per one thousand dollars of 11 assessed value shall not exceed a levy rate per one thousand 12 dollars of assessed value that is equal to one thousand 13 multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the product of 14 the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the current fiscal 15 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy by 16 the remainder of the total assessed value used to calculate 17 such taxes for the budget year minus value attributable to new 18 valuation. 19 b. For purposes of this subsection, âbudget adjustment 20 factorâ , âbudget yearâ , âcurrent fiscal yearâ , and ânew 21 valuationâ mean the same as defined in section 384.1. 22 Sec. 91. NEW SECTION . 422D.5A Levy limitation. 23 1. For fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2027, any 24 property tax levy imposed under this chapter that is limited 25 by law to a specific property tax levy rate per one thousand 26 dollars of assessed value shall not exceed a levy rate per 27 one thousand dollars of assessed value that is equal to one 28 thousand multiplied by the quotient obtained by dividing the 29 product of the budget adjustment factor multiplied by the 30 current fiscal yearâs actual property tax dollars certified 31 for such levy by the remainder of the total assessed value 32 used to calculate such taxes for the budget year minus value 33 attributable to new valuation. 34 2. For purposes of this section, âbudget adjustment factorâ , 35 -63- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 63/ 103 S.F. _____ âbudget yearâ , âcurrent fiscal yearâ , and ânew valuationâ mean 1 the same as defined in section 331.423. 2 DIVISION VIII 3 PROPERTY TAX LEVY RATES 4 Sec. 92. Section 176A.10, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 5 amended by striking the subsection. 6 Sec. 93. Section 312.2, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. The treasurer of state, before making any allotments 9 to counties under this section , shall reduce the allotment to 10 a county for the secondary road fund by the amount by which 11 the total funds that the county transferred or provided during 12 the prior fiscal year under section 331.429, subsection 1 , 13 paragraphs âaâ , âbâ , âdâ , and âeâ , are less than seventy-five 14 fifty-one percent of the sum of the following: 15 (1) From the general fund of the county, the dollar 16 equivalent of a tax of sixteen and seven-eighths eleven and 17 thirteen-sixteenths cents per thousand dollars of assessed 18 value on all taxable property in the county. 19 (2) From the rural services fund of the county, the dollar 20 equivalent of a tax of three two dollars and three-eighths of a 21 cent ten and twenty-one eightieths cents per thousand dollars 22 of assessed value on all taxable property not located within 23 the corporate limits of a city in the county. 24 Sec. 94. NEW SECTION . 444.25 Maximum property tax levy 25 rates ââ adjustments. 26 1. For purposes of this section: 27 a. âBudget yearâ is the fiscal year beginning during the 28 calendar year in which a budget is certified. 29 b. âCurrent fiscal yearâ is the fiscal year ending during 30 the calendar year in which a budget for the budget year is 31 certified. 32 c. âRate-limited property tax levyâ includes any ad valorem 33 property tax levy limited by law to a specific property tax 34 levy rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value used to 35 -64- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 64/ 103 S.F. _____ calculate taxes, but does not include the school district 1 foundation levy under section 257.3, the county general 2 services levy under section 331.423, subsection 1, the county 3 rural services levy under section 331.423, subsection 2, the 4 city general fund levy under section 384.1, subsection 3, 5 the physical plant and equipment levies under section 298.2, 6 the school district bond tax under section 298.18, any levy 7 under chapter 28M, a levy under section 384.12, subsection 8 1, paragraph âbâ , levied for operation and maintenance of 9 a regional transit district, a levy for the office of the 10 assessor under section 441.16, a levy for a county agricultural 11 extension under section 176A.10, any levy under chapter 347 or 12 347A, any levy under chapter 386, and any levy under chapter 13 357F, 357G, or 422D. In addition, ârate-limited property tax 14 levyâ does not include levy rates used in the calculations under 15 section 312.2, subsection 5, paragraph âaâ . 16 2. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, each 17 rate-limited property tax levy may only be imposed if the 18 governmental entity imposed such levy for the fiscal year 19 beginning July 1, 2026, and shall, by operation of this 20 section, be limited to a levy rate per one thousand dollars 21 of assessed value that is equal to one thousand multiplied by 22 the quotient of one hundred two percent of the current fiscal 23 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy 24 divided by the total assessed value used to calculate such 25 taxes for the budget year, but not less than a levy rate per one 26 thousand dollars of assessed value that results in an amount 27 of actual property tax dollars certified for levy for such 28 levy equal to one hundred and one-half percent of the actual 29 property tax dollars certified for such levy for the fiscal 30 year beginning July 1, 2026. 31 3. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2028, and each 32 fiscal year thereafter, rate-limited property tax levies may 33 be imposed by any governmental entity otherwise authorized by 34 law, regardless of whether the governmental entity imposed the 35 -65- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 65/ 103 S.F. _____ levy for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, at rates not 1 to exceed those established by the general assembly by statute 2 following receipt and consideration of the report submitted by 3 the legislative interim committee requested to be established 4 by the legislative council in this division of this Act. 5 Sec. 95. NEW SECTION . 444.26 Use of bonds and indebtedness 6 for general operations ââ prohibition. 7 1. For purposes of this section, âgeneral operationsâ means 8 services or activities generally funded from the governmental 9 entityâs general fund, which are necessary for the operation 10 of the governmental entity, including salaries and benefits, 11 or which are for the health and welfare of the governmental 12 entityâs citizens or primarily intended to benefit all 13 residents of the governmental entity, but excluding services 14 financed by statutory funds other than a debt service fund. 15 2. On or after July 1, 2026, a city or county shall not 16 issue bonds or other indebtedness payable from an ad valorem 17 property tax levy for the purpose of funding the general 18 operations of the city or general operations of the county, as 19 applicable, or otherwise use proceeds from the sale of bonds or 20 issuance of other indebtedness to fund general operations. 21 3. The city finance committee shall adopt rules under 22 chapter 17A for cities to implement this section. The county 23 finance committee shall adopt rules under chapter 17A for 24 counties to implement this section. 25 Sec. 96. PROPERTY TAXATION RATES ââ STUDY COMMITTEE. 26 1. a. The legislative council is requested to establish 27 a legislative study committee during the 2026 legislative 28 interim and the 2027 legislative interim to examine appropriate 29 rates of property taxation imposed by governmental entities 30 following the adjustments to assessment limitations and levy 31 rate limitations made in this Act and determine an alternative 32 methodology and period of time to increase the percentage of 33 actual value at which residential and multiresidential property 34 are subject to tax under section 441.21, subsections 4 and 13, 35 -66- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 66/ 103 S.F. _____ from seventy-five percent to one hundred percent. 1 b. The study committee shall consist of the following voting 2 members of the general assembly: 3 (1) Two members of the senate appointed by the majority 4 leader of the senate. 5 (2) One member of the senate appointed by the minority 6 leader of the senate. 7 (3) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by 8 the speaker of the house of representatives. 9 (4) One member of the house of representatives appointed by 10 the minority leader of the house of representatives. 11 2. The committee shall make recommendations to and file a 12 report with the general assembly relating to the appropriate 13 rates of property taxation imposed by governmental entities 14 and appropriate assessment limitations for residential and 15 multiresidential property following enactment of this Act, no 16 later than January 15, 2028. 17 Sec. 97. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following take effect January 18 1, 2027: 19 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 20 176A.10. 21 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 22 312.2. 23 Sec. 98. APPLICABILITY. The following apply to fiscal years 24 beginning on or after July 1, 2027: 25 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 26 176A.10. 27 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 28 312.2. 29 DIVISION IX 30 LOCAL SALES AND SERVICES TAX 31 Sec. 99. Section 423B.1, subsection 5, paragraph d, Code 32 2026, is amended to read as follows: 33 d. The rate of a local sales and services tax shall be 34 either one percent or one and one-half percent. 35 -67- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 67/ 103 S.F. _____ Sec. 100. Section 423B.1, subsection 6, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) (a) A local option tax may be repealed or the rate of 3 the local vehicle tax increased or decreased or the use of a 4 local option tax revenue changed after an election at which a 5 majority of those voting on the question of repeal or rate or 6 use change favors the repeal or rate or use change. 7 (b) The date on which the repeal, rate change , or use 8 change is to take effect shall not be earlier than ninety days 9 following the election. The election at which the question 10 of repeal , or rate change, or use change is offered shall 11 be called and held in the same manner and under the same 12 conditions as provided in subsections 4 and 5 for the election 13 on the imposition of the local option tax. However, in the 14 case of a local sales and services tax where the tax has not 15 been imposed countywide, the question of repeal or imposition , 16 rate change, or use change shall be voted on only by the 17 registered voters of the areas of the county where the tax has 18 been imposed or has not been imposed, as appropriate. 19 (c) The governing body of the city or unincorporated area 20 where the local sales and services tax is imposed may, upon its 21 own motion, request the county commissioner of elections to 22 hold an election in the city, or portion thereof located in the 23 county, or unincorporated area, as appropriate, on the question 24 of the change in use of local sales and services tax revenues. 25 The election may be held at any time but not sooner than sixty 26 days following publication of the ballot proposition. If 27 a majority of those voting in the city, or portion thereof 28 located in the county, or unincorporated area on the change 29 in use favors the change, the governing body of that area 30 shall change the use to which the revenues shall be used. The 31 Subject to paragraph âdâ , and section 423B.7, subsection 7, 32 paragraph âbâ , the ballot proposition shall list the present 33 use of the revenues, the proposed use, and the date after which 34 revenues received will be used for the new use. 35 -68- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 68/ 103 S.F. _____ Sec. 101. Section 423B.1, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. For amendments to local sales and 3 services tax revenue purpose statements approved at election 4 on or after the effective date of this division of this Act, 5 if the existing revenue purpose statement expressly provides 6 for an amount or percentage of revenue for uses related to 7 road construction, repair, or maintenance, the amended revenue 8 purpose statement shall require amounts or percentages of 9 revenue equal to or greater than those in the existing revenue 10 purpose statement for such uses. 11 Sec. 102. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 12 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 13 DIVISION X 14 ADJUSTMENTS TO MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION FEES AND FUEL TAXES 15 Sec. 103. Section 321.116, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 321.116 Battery electric and plug-in hybrid electric motor 18 vehicle fees. 19 1. For each battery electric motor vehicle subject to an 20 annual registration fee under section 321.109, subsection 1 , 21 paragraph âaâ , and operated on the public highways of this 22 state, the owner shall pay an annual battery electric motor 23 vehicle registration fee, which shall be in addition to the 24 annual registration fee imposed for the vehicle under section 25 321.109, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ . For purposes of this 26 subsection , âbattery electric motor vehicleâ means a motor 27 vehicle equipped with electrical drivetrain components and not 28 equipped with an internal combustion engine, that is propelled 29 exclusively by one or more electrical motors using electrical 30 energy stored in a battery or other energy storage device 31 that can be recharged by plugging into an electrical outlet 32 or electric vehicle charging station. The amount of the fee 33 shall be is one hundred thirty dollars , subject to adjustment 34 pursuant to section 321.118 . 35 -69- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 69/ 103 S.F. _____ 2. For each plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle subject to 1 an annual registration fee under section 321.109, subsection 2 1 , paragraph âaâ , and operated on the public highways of this 3 state, the owner shall pay an annual plug-in hybrid electric 4 motor vehicle registration fee, which shall be in addition 5 to the annual registration fee imposed for the vehicle under 6 section 321.109, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ . For purposes of 7 this subsection , âplug-in hybrid electric motor vehicleâ means a 8 motor vehicle equipped with electrical drivetrain components, 9 an internal combustion engine, and a battery or other energy 10 storage device that can be recharged by plugging into an 11 electrical outlet or electric vehicle charging station. The 12 amount of the fee shall be is sixty-five dollars , subject to 13 adjustment pursuant to section 321.118 . 14 Sec. 104. Section 321.117, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 2. In addition to the fee required for a motorcycle under 17 subsection 1 , the owner of a motorcycle that is a battery 18 electric motor vehicle or plug-in hybrid electric motor 19 vehicle, as those terms are defined in section 321.116 , shall 20 pay an annual electric motorcycle registration fee. The amount 21 of the fee shall be is nine dollars , subject to adjustment 22 pursuant to section 321.118 . 23 Sec. 105. NEW SECTION . 321.118 Electric motor vehicle 24 registration fee adjustments. 25 1. a. The electric motor vehicle registration fees imposed 26 under section 321.116 and section 321.117, subsection 2, shall 27 be adjusted annually beginning July 1 in accordance with this 28 section to reflect the increase, if any, in the consumer price 29 index for all urban consumers. 30 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , a fee shall not be 31 adjusted if any of the following occur: 32 (1) The general assembly nullifies the adjustment by joint 33 resolution, signed by the governor on or before April 30 34 preceding the adjustment. 35 -70- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 70/ 103 S.F. _____ (2) The fee was adjusted under this section each of the 1 preceding three years. 2 (3) The change in the consumer price index for all urban 3 consumers for the calendar year ending on the most recent 4 December 31 was zero or less than zero. 5 2. a. On or before January 15 each year, the department 6 shall calculate the adjusted fees in accordance with subsection 7 3 and submit a report with the adjusted fees in an electronic 8 format to all of the following: 9 (1) The general assembly. Copies of the report shall also 10 be sent by electronic mail to the co-chairpersons of the joint 11 appropriations subcommittee on transportation, infrastructure, 12 and capitals, the chairpersons of the senate and house standing 13 committees on transportation, and the chairpersons of the 14 senate and house standing committees on ways and means. 15 (2) The director of the department of management. 16 b. The report required by this subsection may be submitted 17 jointly with the department of revenueâs report required under 18 section 452A.3A. 19 3. a. The department shall calculate the adjusted fees 20 by multiplying the applicable fee in effect with one of the 21 following, as applicable: 22 (1) The sum of one plus the percentage change, expressed as 23 a decimal, in the consumer price index for all urban consumers 24 for the calendar year ending on the most recent December 31, 25 as published in the federal register by the United States 26 department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, if the change 27 is more than zero percent but less than three percent. 28 (2) One and three one-hundredths, if the percentage 29 change in the consumer price index for all urban consumers 30 for the calendar year ending on the most recent December 31, 31 as published in the federal register by the United States 32 department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, is three 33 percent or more. 34 b. (1) The adjusted fees shall be rounded to the nearest 35 -71- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 71/ 103 S.F. _____ whole dollar. 1 (2) When rounded to the nearest whole dollar, if the 2 adjusted annual electric motorcycle registration fee under 3 section 321.117, subsection 2, does not result in an increase, 4 the department shall use the unrounded adjusted fee as the fee 5 in effect when the department calculates the next adjusted fee. 6 4. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 7 to administer this section. 8 Sec. 106. Section 452A.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding 9 the following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 01. The excise taxes imposed in this 11 section, except for the excise tax imposed on the use of 12 aviation gasoline under subsection 2 and on the use of 13 special fuel for aircraft under subsection 3, paragraph âaâ , 14 subparagraph (3), are subject to adjustment pursuant to section 15 452A.3A. 16 Sec. 107. NEW SECTION . 452A.3A Excise tax adjustments. 17 1. a. The excise taxes imposed under section 452A.3, 18 subsections 1, 4, 5, 6, and 7, section 452A.3, subsection 3, 19 paragraph âaâ , subparagraphs (1), (2), and (4), and section 20 452A.41 shall be adjusted annually in accordance with this 21 section to reflect the increase, if any, in the consumer price 22 index for all urban consumers. The adjusted excise taxes shall 23 be imposed for twelve months beginning each July 1 after the 24 adjusted excise tax is calculated pursuant to this section. 25 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , an excise tax shall not be 26 adjusted if any of the following occur: 27 (1) The general assembly nullifies the adjustment by joint 28 resolution, signed by the governor on or before April 30 29 preceding the adjustment. 30 (2) The excise tax was adjusted under this section each of 31 the preceding three years. 32 (3) The change in the consumer price index for all urban 33 consumers for the calendar year ending on the most recent 34 December 31 was zero or less than zero. 35 -72- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 72/ 103 S.F. _____ 2. a. On or before January 15 each year, the department 1 shall calculate the adjusted excise taxes in accordance with 2 subsection 3 and submit a report with the adjusted excise taxes 3 in an electronic format to all of the following: 4 (1) The general assembly. Copies of the report shall also 5 be sent by electronic mail to the co-chairpersons of the joint 6 appropriations subcommittee on transportation, infrastructure, 7 and capitals, the chairpersons of the senate and house standing 8 committees on transportation, and the chairpersons of the 9 senate and house standing committees on ways and means. 10 (2) The director of the department of management. 11 b. The report required by this subsection may be submitted 12 jointly with the department of transportationâs report required 13 under section 321.118. 14 3. a. The department shall calculate the adjusted excise 15 taxes by multiplying the applicable excise tax in effect for 16 the twelve-month period ending on June 30 with one of the 17 following, as applicable: 18 (1) The sum of one plus the percentage change, expressed as 19 a decimal, in the consumer price index for all urban consumers 20 for the calendar year ending on the most recent December 31, 21 as published in the federal register by the United States 22 department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, if the change 23 is more than zero percent but less than three percent. 24 (2) One and three one-hundredths, if the percentage 25 change in the consumer price index for all urban consumers 26 for the calendar year ending on the most recent December 31, 27 as published in the federal register by the United States 28 department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, is three 29 percent or more. 30 b. The adjusted excise taxes imposed shall be rounded to the 31 nearest one-tenth of one cent. 32 Sec. 108. Section 452A.41, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 33 amended to read as follows: 34 1. An excise tax of two and six-tenths cents is imposed on 35 -73- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 73/ 103 S.F. _____ each kilowatt hour of electric fuel delivered or placed into 1 the battery or other energy storage device of an electric motor 2 vehicle at a location in this state other than a residence. 3 This excise tax is subject to adjustment pursuant to section 4 452A.3A. 5 Sec. 109. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 6 effect January 1, 2027. 7 DIVISION XI 8 OFFICE OF THE ASSESSOR ââ BUDGET AND LEVY 9 Sec. 110. Section 441.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 10 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. For fiscal years beginning on or after 12 July 1, 2027, expenses of the office of the assessor, the 13 examining board, and the board of review related to duties 14 or expenses authorized to be paid using funds levied under 15 sections 96.31, 97B.9, and 97C.10 shall not be paid from the 16 levy under subsection 5. 17 Sec. 111. Section 441.16, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 18 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 a. (1) (a) Any For fiscal years beginning before July 1, 20 2027, any tax for the maintenance of the office of assessor 21 and other assessment procedure shall be levied only upon the 22 property in the area assessed by the assessor, and such tax 23 levy shall not exceed sixty-seven and one-half cents per 24 thousand dollars of assessed value in the assessing area. 25 (b) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, any tax for 26 the maintenance of the office of assessor and other assessment 27 procedure shall be levied only upon the property in the area 28 assessed by the assessor, and such tax levy shall not exceed 29 a rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value in the 30 assessing area that is equal to one thousand multiplied by 31 the quotient of one hundred two percent of the current fiscal 32 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy, 33 excluding the amounts attributable to the types of expenses 34 described in subsection 2, paragraph âcâ , divided by the total 35 -74- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 74/ 103 S.F. _____ assessed value used to calculate such taxes for the budget 1 year. 2 (c) For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 2028, 3 any tax for the maintenance of the office of assessor and other 4 assessment procedure shall be levied only upon the property in 5 the area assessed by the assessor, and such tax levy shall not 6 exceed a rate per one thousand dollars of assessed value in 7 the assessing area that is equal to one thousand multiplied by 8 the quotient of one hundred two percent of the current fiscal 9 yearâs actual property tax dollars certified for such levy 10 divided by the total assessed value used to calculate such 11 taxes for the budget year. 12 (d) For purposes of this subparagraph, âbudget yearâ and 13 âcurrent fiscal yearâ mean the same as defined in section 14 331.423. 15 (2) The county treasurer shall credit the sums received 16 from such levy to a separate fund to be known as the assessment 17 expense fund and from which fund all expenses incurred under 18 this chapter shall be paid. In the case of a county where there 19 is more than one assessor the treasurer shall maintain separate 20 assessment expense funds for each assessor. 21 Sec. 112. Section 441.16, subsection 6, Code 2026, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 6. The assessor shall not issue requisitions so as to 24 increase the total expenditures budgeted for the operation of 25 the assessorâs office. However, for purposes of promoting 26 operational efficiency, the assessor shall , except as provided 27 in subsection 2, paragraph âcâ , have authority to transfer 28 funds budgeted for specific items for the operation of the 29 assessorâs office from one unexpended balance to another; such 30 transfer shall not be made so as to increase the total amount 31 budgeted for the operation of the office of assessor, and no 32 funds shall be used to increase the salary of the assessor or 33 the salaries of permanent deputy assessors. The assessor shall 34 issue requisitions for the examining board and for the board of 35 -75- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 75/ 103 S.F. _____ review on order of the chairperson of each board and for costs 1 and expenses incident to assessment appeals, only on order of 2 the city legal department, in the case of cities and of the 3 county attorney in the case of counties. 4 Sec. 113. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 5 effect January 1, 2027. 6 Sec. 114. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 7 to property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on 8 or after July 1, 2027. 9 DIVISION XII 10 REGIONAL TRANSIT DISTRICT LEVY 11 Sec. 115. Section 28M.5, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 1. a. The commission, with the approval of the board of 14 supervisors of participating counties and the city council 15 of participating cities in the chapter 28E agreement, may , 16 subject to paragraph âbâ , levy annually a tax not to exceed 17 ninety-five eighty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed 18 value of all taxable property in a regional transit district 19 to the extent provided in this section . The chapter 28E 20 agreement may authorize the commission to levy the tax at 21 different rates within the participating cities and counties in 22 amounts sufficient to meet the revenue responsibilities of such 23 cities and counties as allocated in the budget adopted by the 24 commission. However, for a city participating in a regional 25 transit district, the total of all the tax levies imposed in 26 the city pursuant to section 384.12, subsection 1 , paragraph 27 âbâ , and this section shall not exceed the aggregate of 28 ninety-five eighty cents per thousand dollars of the assessed 29 value of all taxable property in the participating city. 30 b. For each fiscal year beginning on or after July 1, 31 2027, the sum of property tax dollars levied for the regional 32 transit district under this subsection and property tax dollars 33 received by the regional transit district from participating 34 cities and counties shall not exceed an amount equal to one 35 -76- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 76/ 103 S.F. _____ hundred two percent of the sum of property tax dollars levied 1 for the regional transit district under this subsection for 2 the immediately preceding fiscal year and property tax dollars 3 received by the regional transit district from participating 4 cities and counties for the immediately preceding fiscal year. 5 Sec. 116. Section 384.12, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 1. a. A tax for the operation and maintenance of a 8 municipal transit system or for operation and maintenance of a 9 regional transit district, and for the creation of a reserve 10 fund for the system or district, in an amount not to exceed 11 ninety-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value each 12 year, when the revenues from the transit system or district are 13 insufficient for such purposes. 14 b. A tax for the operation and maintenance of a regional 15 transit district, and for the creation of a reserve fund for 16 the district under chapter 28M, in an amount not to exceed 17 eighty cents per thousand dollars of assessed value each year, 18 when the revenues from the district are insufficient for such 19 purposes. 20 Sec. 117. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 21 effect January 1, 2027. 22 Sec. 118. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 23 to property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on 24 or after July 1, 2027. 25 DIVISION XIII 26 UTILITY REPLACEMENT TAX TASK FORCE 27 Sec. 119. Section 437A.15, subsection 7, paragraph b, Code 28 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 b. The task force shall study the accuracy of the taxes 30 imposed under this chapter and chapter 437B, ways to modernize 31 the administration of such taxes, methods of simplifying 32 administration of the replacement taxes, elimination of 33 property taxes imposed under this chapter or chapter 437B, 34 simplification of thresholds for replacement tax rate 35 -77- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 77/ 103 S.F. _____ adjustments while retaining tax stability, the effects of 1 the replacement such taxes under this chapter and chapter 2 437B on local taxing authorities, local taxing districts, 3 consumers, and taxpayers through January 1, 2024 December 31, 4 2026, including ways to maintain continuity for local taxing 5 districts and consumers and ways to provide a competitive 6 and equitable tax environment for taxpayers . If the task 7 force recommends modifications to the replacement tax that 8 will further the purposes of tax neutrality for local taxing 9 authorities, local taxing districts, taxpayers, and consumers, 10 consistent with the stated purposes of this chapter taxes , the 11 department of management shall transmit those recommendations 12 to the general assembly. 13 Sec. 120. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 14 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 15 DIVISION XIV 16 LOCAL GOVERNMENT BUDGET STATEMENTS 17 Sec. 121. Section 24.2A, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 18 2026, is amended to read as follows: 19 a. On or before 4:00 p.m. on March 5 of each year, each 20 political subdivision shall file with the department of 21 management a report containing all necessary information 22 for the department of management to compile and calculate 23 amounts required to be included in the statements mailed under 24 paragraph âbâ or provided under paragraph âcâ . If a county 25 or city fails to file all necessary information with the 26 department of management by 4:00 p.m. on March 5, taxes levied 27 by the county or city shall be limited to the prior yearâs 28 budget amount. 29 Sec. 122. Section 24.2A, subsection 2, paragraph b, 30 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 Not later than March 15, the county auditor, using 33 information compiled and calculated by the department of 34 management under paragraph âaâ , shall send to each property 35 -78- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 78/ 103 S.F. _____ owner or taxpayer within the county by regular mail an 1 individual or post under paragraph âcâ a statement containing 2 all of the following for each of the political subdivisions 3 comprising the ownerâs or taxpayerâs taxing district: 4 Sec. 123. Section 24.2A, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. For budgets for fiscal years beginning 7 on or after July 1, 2027, statements under paragraph âbâ , in 8 lieu of regular mail, may be provided by posting the statement 9 not later than March 15 on the political subdivisionâs 10 internet site for public viewing and shall be maintained on 11 the political subdivisionâs internet site with all such prior 12 year statements. Additionally, if the political subdivision 13 maintains a social media account on one or more social media 14 applications, the statement or an electronic link to the 15 statement shall be posted on each such account on a date no 16 later than March 15. 17 Sec. 124. Section 24.2A, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 3. The department of management shall prescribe the form 20 for the report required under subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , the 21 statements required to be mailed under subsection 2 , paragraph 22 âbâ , or provided under subsection 2, paragraph âcâ , and the 23 public hearing notice required under subsection 4 , paragraph 24 âbâ . 25 Sec. 125. Section 24.2A, subsection 4, paragraph b, 26 subparagraph (4), subparagraph division (a), Code 2026, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 (a) Notice of the public hearing was provided to each 29 property owner and each taxpayer within the political 30 subdivision in statements required under subsection 2 , 31 paragraph âbâ . 32 Sec. 126. Section 24.3, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, 33 is amended to read as follows: 34 A municipality shall not certify or levy in any fiscal year 35 -79- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 79/ 103 S.F. _____ any tax on property subject to taxation unless and until the 1 following estimates have been made, filed, and considered, 2 and for school districts, the individual statements have been 3 mailed or posted, as applicable, and public hearings held, as 4 provided in this chapter : 5 Sec. 127. Section 331.434, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 6 amended to read as follows: 7 3. Following, and not until, the requirements of section 8 24.2A are completed, the board shall set a time and place for 9 a public hearing on the budget before the final certification 10 date and shall publish notice of the hearing not less than 11 ten nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing in the 12 county newspapers selected under chapter 349 . A summary of 13 the proposed budget and a description of the procedure for 14 protesting the county budget under section 331.436 , in the form 15 prescribed by the director of the department of management, 16 shall be included in the notice. Proof of publication of 17 the notice under this subsection 3 shall be filed with and 18 preserved by the county auditor. A levy is not valid unless 19 and until the notice is published and individual statements 20 under section 24.2A are mailed or posted . The department of 21 management shall prescribe the form for the public hearing 22 notice for use by counties. 23 Sec. 128. Section 331.435, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 24 amended to read as follows: 25 2. The board shall prepare and adopt a budget amendment in 26 the same manner as the original budget as provided in section 27 331.434 , but excluding the requirements for mailing individual 28 statements under section 24.2A , and the amendment is subject 29 to protest as provided in section 331.436 , except that the 30 director of the department of management may by rule provide 31 that amendments of certain types or up to certain amounts may 32 be made without public hearing and without being subject to 33 protest. A county budget for the ensuing fiscal year shall be 34 amended by May 31 to allow time for a protest hearing to be 35 -80- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 80/ 103 S.F. _____ held and a decision rendered before June 30. An amendment of 1 a budget after May 31 which is properly appealed but without 2 adequate time for hearing and decision before June 30 is void. 3 Sec. 129. Section 384.17, Code 2026, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 384.17 Levy by county. 6 At the time required by law, the county board of supervisors 7 shall levy the taxes necessary for each city fund for the 8 following fiscal year. The levy must be as shown in the 9 adopted city budget and as certified by the clerk, subject to 10 any changes made after a protest hearing, and any additional 11 tax rates approved at a city election. A city levy is not valid 12 until proof of publication or posting of notice of a budget 13 hearing under section 384.16, subsection 3 , is filed with the 14 county auditor and individual statements are mailed or posted 15 under section 24.2A . 16 Sec. 130. Section 384.18, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 2. A budget amendment must be prepared and adopted in the 19 same manner as the original budget, as provided in section 20 384.16 , excluding the requirement for the mailing of individual 21 statements under section 24.2A , and is subject to protest as 22 provided in section 384.19 , except that the committee may by 23 rule provide that amendments of certain types or up to certain 24 amounts may be made without public hearing and without being 25 subject to protest. A city budget shall be amended by May 26 31 of the current fiscal year to allow time for a protest 27 hearing to be held and a decision rendered before June 30. The 28 amendment of a budget after May 31, which is properly appealed 29 but without adequate time for hearing and decision before June 30 30 is void. 31 Sec. 131. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 32 to taxpayer statements under section 24.2A for budgets for 33 fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2027. 34 DIVISION XV 35 -81- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 81/ 103 S.F. _____ REAL ESTATE TRANSFER TAX FORMS 1 Sec. 132. Section 428A.7, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 428A.7 Forms provided by director of revenue. 4 The director of revenue shall prescribe the form of the 5 declaration of value and shall include an appropriate place 6 for the inclusion of special facts and circumstances relating 7 to the actual sales price in real estate transfers including 8 but not limited to factors that distort market value such as 9 built-to-suit sales, sale-leaseback sales, leased fee sales, 10 and the abnormal transactions identified in section 441.21, 11 subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (1) . The director 12 shall provide an adequate number of the declaration of value 13 forms to each county recorder in the state. If the declaration 14 of value form requires or provides for the inclusion of the 15 social security number or federal tax identification number of 16 a seller or buyer, the department shall provide that the social 17 security number or federal tax identification number remains 18 confidential and cannot be obtained by public examination. 19 DIVISION XVI 20 DIVISION OF REVENUE ââ DATA CENTERS 21 Sec. 133. Section 403.19, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 22 2026, is amended to read as follows: 23 a. That portion of the taxes each year in excess of such 24 amount shall be allocated to and when collected be paid into 25 a special fund of the municipality to pay the principal of 26 and interest on loans, moneys advanced to, or indebtedness, 27 whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, including 28 bonds issued under the authority of section 403.9, subsection 29 1 , incurred by the municipality to finance or refinance, in 30 whole or in part, an urban renewal project within the area, 31 and to provide assistance for low and moderate income family 32 housing as provided in section 403.22 . However, except 33 as provided in paragraph âbâ , taxes for the regular and 34 voter-approved physical plant and equipment levy of a school 35 -82- LSB 5195XC (18) 91 md/jh 82/ 103 S.F. _____ district imposed pursuant to section 298.2 , foundation property 1 taxes of a school district imposed under section 257.3 levied 2 against property that is a qualified data center or upon 3 which a qualified data center is operated, and taxes for the 4 instructional support program of a school district imposed 5 pursuant to section 257.19 , taxes for the payment of bonds 6 and interest of each taxing district, and taxes imposed under 7 section 346.27, subsection 22 , related to joint county-city 8 buildings shall be collected against all taxable property 9 within the taxing district without limitation by the provisions 10 of this subsection . For purposes of this paragraph, âqualified 11 data centerâ means a data center, as defined in section 423.3, 12 subsection 95, for which site preparation activities, as 13 defined in section 423.3, subsection 95, began on or after the 14 effective date of this division of this Act. 15 Sec. 134. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 16 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 17 Sec. 135. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 18 to property taxes due and payable in fiscal years beginning on 19 or after July 1, 2027. 20